The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is 40% of the value of the goods....
I am a #PRS_ORG# big customer, so it's no problem for me.
Just need a number or instruction as to what I should put on the package so it can be tracked back to you.
I just ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today, it costs 179€.
I find that quite annoying.
Do I have to cancel and rebook for the better price or is there another way to get the credit?
I also fundamentally believe that children should not be expected to take on a parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think it's good for big brothers and sisters to take care of the little ones in moderation.
Look for a moment, help for a moment, bring the bottle etc.
So they learn responsibility, help out in the family and are integrated.
As long as they can still be children, I don't see a problem.
If your K1 is happy to be alone for a short time and it's OK for him, that's fine.
You can judge for yourself whether this is suitable for your children.
It's not like he's going to be tucking me in and singing me lullabies for hours.
Legally, it is probably questionable.
Perhaps that's why the psychologist's statement came about.
Because if something were to happen like a fire, burglary, earthquake, alien invasion, etc. it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether this is a risk you want to take is, of course, up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and I can still remember most of the plot, but I can't remember the title for the life of me. Maybe someone here knows the title?
The story was about fear and how to overcome it.
At the beginning of the story, a zookeeper commits suicide by overdosing on food and going into the enclosure of his big cats.
The case is taken on by a detective who, after a short investigation, finds his therapist, who runs a clinic where he treats patients with fear.
The commissioner has a little niece who also has a fear (of fire) and lands at this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is anonymously commissioned to go to the scene of the suicide and document it and post the photos online.
In the end, it turns out that this therapist is running an underground therapy group where patients are implanted with a chip that suppresses the fear center of the brain, and the patients are ultimately forced to confront their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(One woman jumps out of a window, another deliberately kills herself)
This is what the book refers to as "the fight."
In the end, there's a big showdown in the hospital, which had been hit by fire.
That's the gist of the plot, I'm pretty sure the book was written in its original form by a French author/author.
If anyone knows of this action or can tell me the title of the book I would be very happy.
Oh, I don't have the Wlan password.
I need to contact my husband first.
That can take a while.
What steps do I have to take afterwards?
Is it also possible to get the price difference back?
Child, 4, splinter under nail
The boy, four years old, has splinters of wood under his thumb nail (outer side) over the entire length of the nail.
They tried to pull him out with a pin.
Very hard to grasp.
Didn't work and hurt.
Now the child reacts hysterically when we try.
No chance.
Tomorrow, I go to the doctor.
All Bosch electric, pneumatic and measuring tools are carefully checked, tested and subject to the strict quality controls of the Bosch quality assurance.
Therefore, Bosch offers a warranty for Bosch electric power tools, pneumatic power tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's claims for defects under the contract of sale and statutory rights are not affected by this guarantee.
For these tools, we offer the following warranty:
We guarantee in accordance with the following regulations (Nos. 2 - 7) by providing free remedial measures for defects in the tool attributable to a material or manufacturing fault within the warranty period.
The warranty period is 24 months, 12 months for commercial or professional use or equivalent stress.
The warranty period begins with the first purchaser.
The date on the original receipt is what matters.
For all blue professional electric tools and measuring tools (excluding high-frequency tools, industrial battery-powered screwdrivers and pneumatic tools) purchased on or after 01.09.2004, the warranty period is extended to 36 months if the purchaser registers the tools within 4 weeks of the purchase date.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as any accessories supplied, are excluded from this warranty extension.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
The registration receipt must be printed immediately, and the original purchase receipt must be presented, indicating the date of purchase.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of his data there.
The warranty does not cover: parts subject to wear and tear due to normal use or other natural causes, defects in the tool due to normal wear and tear, abnormal environmental conditions, abnormal operating conditions, overload or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects caused by the use of accessories, add-ons or replacement parts that are not Bosch original parts.
Tools that have been changed or added to.
Minor deviations from the desired shape, which are insignificant in terms of value and usability of the tool.
The remedy for the lack of conformity that we recognise as our responsibility is to repair the defective tool, at our discretion, free of charge, or to replace it with a tool that is free from defects (including a replacement model, if appropriate).
Any tools or parts replaced become our property.
When did the deadline expire?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have a right of withdrawal for one month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
The combination of a digital decoder and sound module on a circuit board achieves dimensions of only 30mm x 15.5mm and can therefore be installed in almost any H0 and 0 gauge locomotive.
LokSound 5 decoders are available with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm "sugar cube" speaker and a complete speaker kit.
Like all family members, LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
It supports the DCC data format as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 steps are as self-evident as 2- and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders automatically connect to a suitable digital control centre.
It handles all DCC programming modes and thanks to RailCom® it is possible to read the CV values on the main track.
For central computers that can only program CVs 1-255, auxiliary registers may exist.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 steps at 255 addresses.
Three additional Motorola® addresses allow the triggering of 16 functions.
A built-in programming mode makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol allows automatic login to mfx®-compatible central servers.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognizes Märklin® track circuits as well as ZIMO® HLU brake commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
It is also possible to brake with DCC brake blocks or with DC voltage.
In addition, he also uses a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum train automation system allows the automatic transfer between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on analogue DC and AC tracks.
After my voucher was not extended due to a complaint that I did not receive, I will cancel my order worth approx.
#NUMBER#€ removed from my cart and ordered elsewhere where the customer service is better and I don't have to type my fingers off just to get nothing!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omikron: Johnson wants to push ahead with booster vaccinations
Politicians and scientists in Britain are being hit by new Omikron cases.
By New Year's Day, all eligible adults in England should be offered the vaccine.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to catch up even faster with the vaccination campaign against the corona virus in view of the rapidly increasing number of Omikron cases.
Every adult in England should be offered a booster dose by the end of the year, if at least three months have passed since their second jab, Johnson said in a prerecorded video message to his countrymen on Sunday night.
Previously, the target date was the end of January.
The UK government will also provide additional support to accelerate the vaccination programmes in Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
We are facing an emergency with the Omikron variant, which is why the vaccination protection must be stepped up urgently, said Johnson.
The good news is that the protection level can be raised again with a third dose.
"Now let's get boosted," Johnson said.
On Sunday, 1239 more cases of the Omicron variant were recorded in the UK, taking the total to 3137.
Compared to the previous day, it was an increase of 65 percent. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded from the purchase price when collected?
I think everyone should introduce themselves with pronouns
I sent in an application.
Today, an invitation to a conversation by mail was sent.
I want to answer the e-mail.
However, unfortunately, the name is not "Peter," but a somewhat more complicated name.
I googled it and depending on where they come from, it's either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write an email now.
Can someone please help me?
** I'm an immigrant and I don't want to step on anyone's toes.
Conclusion: Everyone should imagine pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books.
Four of them are going.
Only the one I bought today doesn't work.
Apparently, the chair had a hidden defect at the time of sale.
How can such a mattress defect occur after 9 months?
First on the #PRS_ORG#
But this has been the case for some time now.
No more than 14 days.
That's why I've always bought the last books online and read them on the #PRS_ORG# website.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# but wanted to buy 8.
However, there were none.
Now they are back in stock and I would like to add two chairs to my order and invoice me for them.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I'm going to be writing here about domestic abuse in some detail.
I just need to write something for my soul.
I (21) come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence more often for professional reasons.
One theme that really nags at me and unfortunately comes up all too often is that many victims don't ask for help or think we can't help them.
I am aware that we cannot do everything and it is not perfect.
But there are few things in my line of work that move me more than when I can't do anything about a situation.
I see the blue dots, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation with the perpetrator out of sight and hearing, I cannot reach everyone.
I don't know what the reason is, maybe it's fear, fear of revenge, fear of leaving the normal social environment, fear of pulling the children out of this.
What I always want to make clear to everyone, sometimes even myself, is that everyone deserves to be able to live without violence.
I want women to know that they don't have to just take abuse.
I often wish I could help in some way... I know I can't.
But it will never get easier.
Please, always remember that you are worth living a life without violence, it is so incredibly important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What does the series have to do with "League of Legends"?
Plenty of fantasy, many complicated names, a jaw-dropping set design: "Arcane," the series set in the "League of Legends" computer game universe, has recently launched on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball Bundesliga: Derby disaster for MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg against Merlins Crailsheim
At least on young Johannes Patrick, he was relieved.
Nothing again: For the second time in less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg coach John Patrick said of the cup defeat in early October against the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim: "We still have some anger in our stomachs."
However, after the game, the share price did not recover - but rose again in light of the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
Whereby more than the naked result disappointed.
In a nutshell, a statistic sums up the whole dilemma: The three-point percentage was just 13 percent, 4 baskets (all of them by young Johannes Patrick) in 31 attempts - any questions?
John Patrick offered the answer: "We weren't focused enough after the win in Tenerife and didn't do what we had trained for."
That is, to move the ball.
Sebastian Gleim's opposite, on the other hand, reacted differently: "It was a great game to win against Ludwigsburg for the second time," said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
Only 750 people were allowed into the Hohenlohe Arena on Saturday, but they paid for their tickets.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who scored 22 points and steered his team.
"The best playmaker I've ever coached," Gleim said.
While Patrick's team saw the likes of Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) struggle across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the Giants prevent a total disaster and came as far as eight points after having been 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored twelve points.
Fortunately, there is not much time left for brooding.
Already on Wednesday (7:30 p.m.) the Riesen welcome the Skyliners Frankfurt, then also in Ludwigsburg a maximum of 750 spectators.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I have already been in contact with them a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have checked with a lawyer and have therefore written to them again.
We signed up about a year ago.
Always like a boiled egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He can enthuse his audience with new interpretations of songs from the 1920s and 1930s.
Currently, he is on the "Guten Tag, liebe Glück" tour - if he is allowed to perform.
Actually, Max Raabe would have celebrated his birthday on stage in Leipzig on Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "in accordance with the authorities' instructions" to contain the coronavirus.
Other performances he had planned for Advent will have to be postponed, as it says on the website of the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists will then try to make up for the dates they had to postpone in 2020 due to the pandemic.
Born on 12 December 1962 in Lünen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Max Raabe has sung a lot and enjoyed it as a youth.
In Berlin he studied opera singing, in 1986 he founded the Palast Orchester together with his fellow students.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager and chanson in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He has been awarded many prizes.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - the second place of the charts.
He's managed to move it from the fringe into the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, his blonde hair tightly combed back and paying attention to etiquette, Max Raabe is no longer to be found in the current German-language music scene.
Since 2020, he has been touring with the programme "Guten Tag, liebe Glück". dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood beforehand?
It can be supplemented with existing furniture and so we can check beforehand whether it fits in with the colour scheme
It still doesn't work, I can only long for the cover but not turn the pages.
Federal Minister of Urban Development Klara Geywitz: The expropriation does not create new housing
The new Federal Minister of Housing, Klara Geywitz (SPD), has spoken out against the expropriation of large apartment companies, as demanded in a referendum in Berlin.
"With an expropriation, no new apartments are created, only the owner structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My goal is to give tenants peace of mind that their rent will remain affordable for years to come.
By the way, a colourful mix of for example private landlords, co-operatives or housing associations is the best protection against monopolisation.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission on how to deal with the result of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz is not ruling out talks with the FDP in the Ampel coalition on further tightening of the rental law.
The coalition agreement provides for a rent cap until 2029, a cap on rent increases in tight housing markets and the expansion of the rent index.
I will speak with the Minister of Justice to implement this as soon as possible.
If the rental market does not improve, "we will talk with the coalition partners about further steps," said the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to order something and noticed a few days later that I had forgotten the last step of payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
When will they have it back in stock?
Or if it will happen again?
#PRS_ORG# with storage (180 x #NUMBER# cm)
The voucher sounds great
Then I will activate it myself for the new order
Many thanks for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long will the shipping take?
I already cut my finger
That's absolute cheek
At least 100 dead in Kentucky tornadoes
A severe storm system has churned through the United States, producing numerous tornadoes.
More than 100 deaths could be attributed to the storm alone in Kentucky.
The pictures from there reminded me of a war zone.
Tornadoes have caused severe damage in the United States on Saturday night, possibly killing up to 100 people.
The storms left a 320-mile-long trail of destruction, especially in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after visiting the disaster area that everything was gone everywhere the tornado had passed.
Houses, shops, government buildings - gone.
Parts of industrial plants, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is possible at all.
He is alone in the state of Kentucky with up to 100 deaths, official figures are rising hourly.
Hi, I just saw that the Vitrine #NAME# is sold out.
That's very disappointing.
Is it still being produced?
Or is it completely out of stock?
Is it possible to order this cabinet in another country?
When do you report?
If the delivery cannot be made to my apartment, I must cancel the order!
I understand that, but can I order the blanket and have it shipped to Germany?
I had returned an item via the contact form or a return and wanted to ask if it would be received or processed, as I had not yet received a confirmation email.
Companies pay for vaccinations and change their advertising slogans
While the federal government continues to reject the proposal for a vaccination bonus, companies in Austria have themselves taken the initiative and are offering their employees a vaccination bonus.
They are on the same line as the social partners ÖGB and Wirtschaftskammer, who today called for financial incentives for vaccination.
Also the transformation of advertising slogans into vaccination appeals - in German style - is supposed to increase the willingness to be vaccinated against the corona virus.
He moved to a company where he had worked before.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He obviously didn't stick around at his old job and was looking for something else.
You can do that too.
And that he didn't like you back then: well, that's fine.
He was not happy with his job either.
There are too many variables.
Please take the cancellation.
That will then be relevant in court.
I'm taking a screenshot.
Guten Tag - ich interessiere mich für den Esstisch von Boone in Weiß.
Is it also available in 230cm?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
The new Smeg coffee vending machine brings freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours in combination with the matt-brushed stainless steel front make the new SMEG coffee machine with milk frother into a design object.
In line with the reduced design, all functions such as grind size and amount of water, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, Ristretto or a mild coffee can be selected using just four buttons.
Thanks to the steam nozzle, coffee milk and milk foam specialties can also be prepared.
Help with first own campaign
Boron to the rescue!
I'm currently running a group of 4 friends through the adventure Over the Greyhawk Pass and want to seamlessly transition my heroes into a campaign I've written specifically for them.
We're playing DSA 5.
The big arc is written, the villains and their motivations are written, the individual acts are written and now I'm writing the introductory adventure and I'm already stumbling over my own feet at the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to deliver a cartload of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near Lake Thuran.
There, the further course of action will develop.
Some miles from the village, the heroes are ambushed by a group of goblins and lured into an ambush.
I want to give the player characters the opportunity to solve the confrontation in different ways: to convince, to act, to threaten, to recognize the danger as early as possible, whatever the players come up with.
Group size: 8 common goblins, 2 with spears, 6 with bows and swords
If unnoticed, the goblins ambush the hero in a ditch and flank him on either side with three archers each, while two with spears stop the wagon.
If it comes to a fight and the heroes lose, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all made unconscious and subsequently found and healed by the son of the village schoolmaster, a half-elf.
Of course, the cart is gone.
2. If a defeat is unavoidable, then this half-elf with two of his servants intervenes and comes to the aid of the hero in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is fine.
How do you feel about Deus ex Machina for solution 2?
Is the Encounter too much of an adventure for a first cruise?
The goblin group will later play a crucial role, so they are not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: Wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I will guarantee that many of your ideas will be implemented, and now I also have more confidence in my narratives.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again, they've come together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
So I would like to send them back anyway
Can you then bring back the receipts so I can pack up the lamp and bring it to #PRS_ORG#?
Shipping costs and time saved - and at the same time the environment is spared!
If you need more than one item, please click "Pay Now" only after you have added all items to your cart.
Therefore, the combi delivery is automatically calculated and you will receive everything in one package.
This way you save yourself the multiple invoicing/payments and the environment is happy because no unnecessary packaging material and unnecessary fuel is used for the delivery of multiple packages.
Faster delivery with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
We usually ship your order on the same working day, provided payment is received by 14:00.
So that your package arrives as quickly as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that it is also on your mailbox and your doorbell.
Would you like us to send your package to a post office box?
Please choose DHL, as only DHL can deliver to DHL parcel stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number if you have selected DHL or DPD as your shipper.
Therefore, you can already check from about 22:00 onwards where your package is.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be delighted if you would rate us positively and give us all five stars in the detailed ratings.
If anything is not to your full satisfaction, we would be grateful if you would contact us before you leave a review.
That's the only way we have a chance to make you happy.
We didn't do anything with the chair.
And then the crack was there
I was just sitting there
Here was the lower part, so to speak, the part with the damaged storage.
Will everything be picked up or just the storage space?
I'm sick of Sky Sports F1
Hello dear F1 fans, throughout the season the quality on German Sky has been decreasing more and more, so I want to vent a little bit with this post.
First of all, the transmission was interrupted in the middle of the F2 race to start the F1 pre-race coverage on time.
While the schedule was far behind the plan due to the delayed start and the accident, they would have still been able to show the last (planned) ten minutes and the championship decision.
Apparently, however, legal reasons mean that the F1 has priority and therefore everything else must be restricted, so that Sky DE had no choice here.
Still daft, given that Sky UK had the rights to broadcast the race.
Nevertheless, a small compliment: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has managed the difficult situation around the serious accident well.
Then there was a lack of knowledge by the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher, who didn't know that you can change the tyres under a red flag.
Although this situation has already happened in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both only came to the conclusion that Verstappen could change his tyres when there were relevant radio messages about it to Hamilton.
Both commentators at Sky UK and RTL knew immediately that this was an option for Verstappen.
I think you should know such basic rules if you are going to commentate on a pay-TV channel for Formula 1.
It is also not the first time that now according to the rules, both have simply persistent uncertainties in the area of rules.
In general, Roos' commentating style is not liked, but it is conceded that it is a matter of taste.
But Heiko Wasser from RTL is even more serious for me.
There are also constant absurdities that make both of them look unprofessional, like ordering coffee from (just as clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter, in particular, brings a lot of confusion to the commentary, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising simply takes over at Sky, in the final round Sky is the only channel that goes into advertising, as one can listen to F1TV there, only the German soundtrack without commentary must be listened to directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF do.
Both of these broadcasters also make less advertising than Sky, and that as a free-to-air broadcaster.
While I must praise Glock and Baumgartner for their work, this alone does not make me overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of Sky Sport F1's programme is also very thin on the ground and full of repeats.
In total, Sky is really the worst German-speaking channel that broadcasts the F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job with the four races they are allowed to broadcast.
In fact, the grand prix season is a lot less fun than it could be with a decent broadcaster.
I would like to know what you think.
Here: #PRS_ORG#-Pendant light, brass and multi-coloured glass x 1
Hello, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and it is still not delivered.
I've contacted the chat twice so far and nothing.
The First Lady told me it was going out Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday she was checking and sending an email and she never responded.
Hello, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect (the material has a hole in the front part of the chair).
I ask for your support.
Air pumps are ideal for supplementing an aquarium with additional oxygen.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using air hoppers.
This series is offered in 3 different versions.
Look at the table at the end of the offer.
Here you can see the performances side by side.
If the pumps are powerful enough, you can run an entire system with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable so that you can connect more than one outlet.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but fan pumps are also available to set an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (find them in our shop) or with a decor that turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here you would call a treasure chest, shell or the like.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction, which results in low operating noise.
The installation is very easy.
The blower pump is connected to the exhaust pipe via a 4/6 mm (3/16") air hose...and off you go.
The fan pump should be the same or higher than the water level and be mounted outside.
If the blower pump is located lower than the water level, a check valve should be placed between them.
Just cut the air hose and put the valve in between.
This would prevent the water from running back through the pump once it started to run backwards...
If the fan pump is to be used outdoors, it should be covered and protected from moisture
The MK series pumps are pure power packages that consume little energy
Even though we state a processing time of 3 days here on ebay, the parcels are packed every day and the parcels are collected every day.
Everything goes well on the way, it goes very quickly.
We just want to make sure that nobody gets upset because it took a little longer.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for all the employees who also work in the forwarding industry...of course, here no Corona stops.
Please do not rate it badly just because the delivery is delayed, this is only due to the parcel services.
Of course people like to moan about these services, even though we're saying... they've had it tough
This is also very different regionally.
Don't be mean to anyone, stay healthy and we all hope that there will be better times again.
How long does it take to order the yellow with and without armrests?
Can you also get your legs waxed here?
Amazon founder Bezos sends daughter and TV host into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV host and four other passengers took a short trip into space.
They were transported to space on Saturday by the New Shepard rocket system of Blue Origin, founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The ten-minute flight took off and landed in the west of the US state of Texas.
Under a brilliant blue sky, Bezos personally received the newly-minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue jumpsuit, as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
Under the applause of friends, family members and Blue Origin employees, the six passengers climbed out one by one and hugged Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
According to Blue Origin, it took 10 minutes and 13 seconds to reach a height of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of the 1961 astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), who was flown into space by NASA, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were guests of the company, and the other four passengers paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess, and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not disclose how much each person paid for their ticket.
After the short flight, Laura Shepard Churchley recalled her father's mission.
He worked hard on his cases and had to do everything himself.
She just went along for the ride, said the 74-year-old with a laugh.
Michael Strahan also expressed his enthusiasm.
He would like to go back into space, the moderator said.
New Shepard flies up to 100 km
The rocket system "New Shepard" flies largely autonomously.
The capsule separated from the rocket during the flight and reached an altitude of about 100 kilometres above the Earth, briefly in weightlessness, before the reusable object was slowed down by large parachutes and landed.
The International Astronautical Federation and many other experts see 100 km above the Earth as the boundary of space, but there is no official international regulation.
It was Blue Origin's third manned flight, with the first in July featuring Amazon founder Bezos himself, along with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot, and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second, in October, featured the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, known for his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek," as well as the former NASA engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the vice president of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics charge that Bezos and Blue Origin are pushing the space tourism business largely for profit without scientific research interests for the betterment of humanity and without regard for the climate.
With a push of a button, you can easily choose whether your "Smart Stone" should permanently glow in one colour or whether it should play through its entire colour palette.
When switched on, the light bulb changes colour for around one minute before gradually transitioning to the next decorative colour.
The solid construction of the "Smart Stone" light is impervious to the elements.
In snowy conditions, its light is even particularly good - only with a shortened duration of light is to be expected once the days become shorter.
Please make sure that no snow covers the solar module in winter.
"Smart Stone" uses a NiMH battery in the common AA format, which can be easily replaced if required.
You can get a suitable replacement battery from our online shop and thus further reduce the service life of your Dekoleuchte.
A high-gloss effect spray that leaves a smooth surface similar to chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, in particular for the design of rims, wheel arch covers, and paint-able plastic parts, after suitable pre-treatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering for the first time a washable and weatherproof chrome spray.
The optimal effect is achieved on black backgrounds, e.g. by using DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including effect primer and dust-binding cloth for optimal preparation of the painting.
For use on metal, wood, glass, lacquered hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that fits :) I don't need anything else to add?
They just need the tracking number for my mail?
Someone who works in biochemistry or is studying biochemistry
I am currently studying Biochemistry in the first semester and find the subject itself quite interesting, and I don't mind being in the lab (I've already done the inorganic chemistry practical).
I have also looked into career prospects before starting my studies, but at that time I was still thinking that I would definitely study until I got my doctorate.
But at the moment I have doubts, especially about the career prospects.
On one side (Studycheck etc) one hears again and again of super career opportunities and the profession is totally in demand, on the other side one hears again and again of unemployed biologists and incredibly poorly paid jobs.
So I would really like to know:
1) What is she currently working on?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What did you study/ what training have you done?
4) Would you do it all again?
Thanks for your answers!
I'm currently really unsure and am considering dropping out of university in 2022 and doing a degree in computer science.
If you have any experience with this host, they also like to write a review :)
Extra stress before holidays and public holiday weekends
This topic came up last week with me.
But I had to use my long weekend to relax.
That's why I'm only now putting up a post about it.
Not only during large holidays, like Christmas holidays, do we have a lot of stress at our plant.
It seems there are even before holidays plus bridge days.
It was like this: Last week was the Assumption, which we call "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, most people and businesses make a bridge day, which is semi-official.
Last week, it was a long 4-day weekend at home.
So what happened last week?
Everywhere stress.
Loads of e-mails that had to be sent before leaving, orders here, orders there, everything *had* to be done before the long weekend.
Because... yes, because?
Because "next week" sounds so far away after so much time and that can't be?
Or because people are willing to spend as much in a shortened week as they would in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also powerfully irritated.
What is this self-indulgence for holidays?
Why should we have holidays if we can't enjoy them properly?!
The stress didn't come from above, the colleagues were all very self-sufficient.
My question is simply: Are we the only ones like this, the Swiss?
Is this our Reformed-Evangelical way?
Or does she know that in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her home state of Thuringia - but has no presents yet.
"The beautiful thing is, even if there is no snow in Erfurt, you just drive to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest," said the actress and singer Hit Radio FFH.
She'll get into the spirit by baking cookies with her son and building a fort.
"I love it," said Catterfeld.
But until the contemplative days, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time I have no presents, I have to get going now."
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth course of the moult and feather renewal.
NEKTON-Bio contains all the essential vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg of biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of the avian husbandry-related injuries are exclusively due to nutritional errors.
Since the plumage is made of protein-rich substances, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet for the bird is a prerequisite for the formation of a perfect feather coat.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain enough vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
Much of the animal mortality that occurs during the moult is due to inadequate or unbalanced protein intake and/or a lack of vitamins and minerals.
The unfavourable amino acid ratio in most plant-based feeds is taken into account and balanced in the composition of NEKTON-Bio.
No other vitamin preparations should be administered while taking NEKTON-Bio.
NEKTON Bio is water soluble and can be easily administered via drinking water or soft food.
Thank you, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work
DDR handwork model of the Altbau E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/DR, the loco was in use in Silesia and Central Germany, the very rare loco probably comes from the model railway enthusiast ME Heft 11/1968 conversion proposal, used with play tracks and missing parts, see photos, the E 95 series is a heavy freight electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), which was designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Silesian network, possibly the kit comes from the small series company ZSCHUTZKE and BACHMANN.
One locomotive is in the DB Museum Halle (Saale) and has been restored to working order
The Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft commissioned the AEG in 1924 to submit proposals for an electric locomotive to haul 2,200-ton freight trains and 530-ton passenger trains at 45 km/h.
The maximum speed was 65 km/h.
Thus, the DRG determined in March 1926 that the delivery would be as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with worm gear drive from AEG with the delivery of the mechanical part, the Siemens-Schuckertwerke with the electrical part.
From December 1927 to June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
All survived World War II and found themselves again on the territory of the later GDR.
In 1946, the locomotives were sent as reparations to the Soviet Union.
They returned to Germany by November 1952.
The assessment of the reparability of all six locomotives was carried out at the Reichsbahnausbesserungswerk Dessau.
[4] As the electrification of the mid-German network progressed, a growing need for locomotives for heavy freight train services arose, and in 1959 the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were rebuilt, with the remaining machines serving as spare parts suppliers.
First, the E 04, E 44 and E 94, which were available in larger quantities, were preferred.
Only when it became clear that the recovery number would not be further increased with the E 94, did the E 95 come back into focus of the recovery effort.
[4] Initially, the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway depot.
They came to the railway depot Halle P. in 1960.
They were used in a separate circulation plan, mostly in front of coal trains from the Geiseltal to Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
As the locomotives aged, the complex controls became problematic.
This often resulted in gunners getting stuck in their hatches.
Then, the on-board Beimann, who had to accompany the locomotive at all times, had to use a hammer and a wooden wedge to release the pins during the journey.
Damage to the traction motors was common and often led to the locomotive being out of service for months at a time.
[5] By the end of the 1960s, there were enough new locomotives available and electrification was not planned to be expanded significantly, so the Reichsbahn could do without old locomotives and most of the branch line types, so the E 95s were taken out of service.
In addition, Deutsche Reichsbahn wanted to operate electric locomotives with only one crew member, which would have been a problem in the operation of the trains due to the aforementioned problems with the machines and the view from the driver's seat.
[5] After mid-1969, the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were withdrawn, followed by the E 95 01, which retired on 5 October 1970.
The intended new designation 255 001 was thus never used.
All locomotives except E 95 02 have been dismantled.
The E 95 02 was set up as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10 as a point heater at the main station in Halle.
It took some time to convince the Reichsbahn officials that the E 95 should be preserved as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the locomotive's initial external restoration began with the aim of presenting it at an exhibition of vehicles at the RAW Dessau.
[5] Since then it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the internal completion of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is preserved in the DB Museum Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the tradition association Bw Halle P have been working on the operational restoration of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive was presented for the first time at an exhibition in the museum depot in Arnstadt with new inner and outer paintwork, with the transformers checked and five driving motors in working order.
The locomotives were in use on the Silesian Mountain Railway and its branch lines until 1945, where they proved their worth due to their reliable drive and low maintenance requirements.
In February 1945, the machines were moved to Leipzig to be housed in the central German network.
The main area of operation was initially Silesia
HO scale model in OVP, function good, optical repairs are necessary on the loco in own work, dusty, with play tracks, cellar smell !!!, very rare HO scale model, very small edition - perhaps the kit also comes from the small-series firm ZSCHUTZKE and BACHMANN
The packaging may have labels and storage marks.
Yes, the F-parts are it
I got a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The beam is held up by two feet, unfortunately these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What are we going to do now?
I can't put the bed together.
The middle bar is held by two feet, unfortunately these are faulty.
The middle beam doesn't fit into the provided holder.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be released?
No, no flat ones.
These are, according to the assembly instructions, the right ones, they were just too narrow
But that's not important.
As long as they serve their purpose
They're not flat with me
Could I get this sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, can I explain the problem to you again?
Dwelling fire with two minor injuries and high damage
Two people have been slightly injured in a fire in a house in Oberbayern.
In addition, an estimated damage of six-figure euros has been incurred, the police reported on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjacent house in Kinsau (district of Landsberg am Lech).
Two residents were reportedly taken to hospital on Sunday with light smoke inhalation.
The exact cause of the fire was not known at first, but the police did not suspect arson.
The Kripo Fürstenfeldbruck has taken over the further investigations.
But it comes later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To combat fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccine photo
Uğur Şahin posted a photo of his first vaccination on the social network "LinkedIn" in January 2021
Biontech CEO Ugur Sahin has not publicly commented on his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur has published a photo showing his corona vaccination.
His friend's illness prompted him to act, Şahin said.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based biotech company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, posted a photo showing him receiving a coronavirus vaccine.
On social media, there were false claims that I was not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," Şahin wrote in a post on the network "LinkedIn" on Friday.
"For months now, my friends have been urging me to post a photo of me getting vaccinated to combat these false rumours."
So far he has refused because he did not want the communication to revolve around him.
But a call last week has changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened to hear that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe case of Covid-19 and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, Şahin wrote.
He didn't ask why.
"The most common cause, however, appears to be fear, which is often stoked by misinformation and distrust."
Fear can only be fought with facts, sometimes it is better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating online in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was created in December 2020, as the Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"I am currently not allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
There is a prioritisation in Germany for the vaccination of the vaccine.
The prioritisation has since been lifted - and the CEO of Biontech himself has been vaccinated three times, according to his own statements.
Fire in substation: tens of thousands of people without power
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia, the lights went out on Friday evening: no electricity and in many cases no heating either.
A fire had disabled a substation.
Tens of thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg-Kreis in North Rhine-Westphalia had to go without electricity for around 24 hours after a fire caused severe damage to a substation.
On Friday evening, 41,000 residents and residents in several municipalities turned off the lights due to the fire.
Westnetz reported that on Saturday, numerous emergency power supplies were in operation until the widespread outage was finally rectified late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers and helpers from the THW provided support in the municipalities.
Authorities offered care places in schools and appealed for help from neighbours.
The supplier thanked the affected parties for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have brought significant restrictions.
We would also like to thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire departments and the THW for their tireless efforts," said Florian Witt, head of the primary technology division, in a statement on Saturday evening.
The repair of the damage will take several days, as the Westnetz workers were only able to put some of the cables back into operation temporarily, he explained.
According to the company, the fire was caused by a technical defect.
Electricity is back on
The fire, which broke out at about 7.15 p.m. on Friday, has damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear in the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation according to Westnetz.
There are extensive cleaning and repair works to be carried out there.
In parallel, a connection to a 30,000-volt voltage level has been created.
With this bypass, the power supply is restored.
Since Saturday at 6 p.m., over 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had electricity again.
Another 20,000 residents of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were switched on from 21.30.
Since 23:15, the last customers affected by the outage have also had power restored.
Over 80 installers from Westnetz and partner companies were on the scene.
Authorities had called on neighbours to help after setting up a back-up power supply for important buildings on Saturday afternoon.
"It is now important that citizens look after their neighbours, especially older or single people, and let the local fire station know if help is needed," explained Landrat Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
The focus was on residents of nursing homes when setting up and operating emergency power generators.
In addition, according to the authorities, temporary care facilities have been set up in schools for those people who could not care for themselves or who required electrical medical equipment or were dependent on medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling in Germany is sold out.
Can I buy them from you and pay in euros?
It is the day cover #PRS_ORG# in blue green.
I hope you all have a great day and stay healthy ♡
But I can't mount the lower shelf on the table top.
It is Custom #NAME#.
There are three versions of this.
We wanted those with table top diameters of #NUMBER#
We received 155 cm in diameter.
Today my #PRS_ORG came, but I can't fit it together and thus shorten it.
Can you help me further?
Otherwise I would have to return it, as it is not suitable for the purpose.
I would appreciate a reply
Yes, it's really easy!
Then we do it like this!
Will you send me the return receipt by mail?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, I had not restarted the E-#PRS_ORG# before the purchase.
Should I do that now?
I find it almost insulting to get such a low score.
We are not in agreement with this
Nordic combined: Kombiner Riiber wins
The German Nordic combined athletes Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid have been on the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo had to concede defeat once again to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started the race with a large lead after the ski jumping.
Return of Order #NUMBER#
When will the money be transferred back to my account?
Yes, we both made new ones and use version 4.5...
It could be that they've heard of the problem before
I bought a book directly with my #PRS_ORG# card, it seems to be there too.
When I want to open it, the message pops up, ups!
This document could not be opened.
File a possible error report to the customer service.
As far as I can tell it's a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can you help me out?
Chat connection is down and now?
I also have to work!
To ensure an even and clean finish, you should clean the components with soap and water to remove dust, grease and fingerprints, rinse with clear water and dry.
Before you apply the paint for the first time, it is recommended to practice with 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inner side of the parts or on a yoghurt cup.
The first mark on the part
Draw the brush in a straight line next to each other.
A light overlap of the colour layers later results in an even surface.
Avoid quick back and forth wiping with the brush.
This results in unrealistic areas.
A model is not a fence.
Start with the lighter colours.
The dark ones could otherwise later be seen through.
Metallic tones and metallic colours come in at the end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, it can result in unsightly metallic flecks when mixed with normal colours.
Leave the painted parts to dry for a day before varnishing.
The models achieve a faithful appearance through the decals or decals.
From national markings on aircraft to ship names, to decorative strips and markings on car models: The decals give the model the finishing touch.
Bring the decals in the correct order to the parts that are still accessible.
A cockpit can be more easily cleaned before it is installed in the fuselage.
More important than the right tool, like scissors, tweezers and a toothpick, is time, patience and a steady hand.
Cut out each decal individually and arrange them as needed.
Decals are also called water slide decals because you briefly wet the back of the decal until the backing paper turns dark from the moisture.
Then you move the picture a little bit away from the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you have also moistened beforehand).
While holding the decal in place on the model with a tool, pull the backing paper away from the side.
Caution: Always check first that the picture is correctly positioned on the paper before you completely remove it from the paper, so that it does not stick, knit or even tear.
Excess water is absorbed by a household towel.
Warning not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time when I look at something else, then I can no longer read the book and have to log in and log out and load the book again and look for the place where I left off.
On Saturday, I already communicated with you.
Will I get this by email?
For all three packages?
Because the lamp came in 3 separate packages to me
Thanks anyway!
Then I'll go elsewhere to buy once the money comes back.
But can I get it back without any problems?
Infertility treatment with PKV / What is a "health insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We were in fertility treatment for some time, now that it comes to the settlement with the PKV, this suddenly turns upside down.
In order:
We had applied for the wish for a child at the PKV in advance and received the approval for 3 attempts.
The trials were not restricted in any way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.).
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth and was reimbursed by the PKV.
Some time later we tried for a second child, and carried out 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but had not yet factored in the PKV.
We applied again for reimbursement from the PKV and were again granted 3 more attempts.
After some further attempts (we have carried out more trials than promised, of course the most expensive ones are charged to the PKV) we submitted the bills to the PKV and were in for a nasty surprise: instead of 5 trials (2+3) the PKV will only pay for 3 trials.
The reason: With the pregnancy/birth, the other 2 trials of the first acceptance fail.
The second pregnancy is a new insurance case.
However, according to the AGB, "The insurance event begins with the treatment and ends when treatment is no longer required."
The questions to the experts in the round here:
* Who is right, the PKV (only 3 attempts are made) or we (there are 5 attempts to be made)?
* Would the PKV have pointed out to us that with a birth the further attempts would have failed?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (caused by blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by having your first child.
It would be great if the experts here would weigh in.
Thank you very much for your help!
Can you please email me the three options and tell me how I can reach them best
Okay.
We will no longer order anything from them.
If they add up the sales of me and my friend #NAME# (same address) they have obviously lost a good customer.
They can pass this on to their manager if they wish.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday, my colleague told me that the refund was made and now you are telling me that I have to return the thing.
I can't do anything about the fact that the chest of drawers arrives completely broken at my place
Please look at the screenshot to see what the colleague wrote
It is clearly stated that the refund was requested and I have still not received a refund via #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they've just lost two loyal customers.
My boyfriend has also ordered various furniture for our apartment through his account.
We won't do that anymore.
No, the defect only appeared after a few months.
An office chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise they can't sell it as an office chair.
Regardless of this, the 24-month guarantee applies.
No, I can't get another kind of packaging.
I will dismantle the cabinet and make it available to the transport company.
Guten Tag, ich habe eine Frage zu Ihrer Serie von #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional hockers, but we can't find them on your website.
Can they help?
Topic of the week: The best low budget films
What a low-budget film is, there is no general definition with exact budget limits.
Wikipedia has this to say about it:
>A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
There are plenty of lists of low-budget films online, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know any interesting representatives of this category?
What's exciting about that?
And what do you not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, and have already furnished 2 apartments completely with your furniture.
Wanted to get the best price for the grey leather sofa Odelle.
The delivery time has now been extended again, is it now also reliable?
Thank you
Best regards
There is no phone number, a chat where you have to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position... I give up again soon, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
The EU can declare a "half victory" in its conflict with the Belarusian regime, according to political expert Raphael Bossong.
The costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the Belarus border with Poland and Lithuania," Bossong told the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not been able to resolve the confrontation, the researcher at the Berlin Foundation for Science and Politics (SWP) explained.
This state of suspended animation - Belarus is not quite small, but the EU feels like a winner - is likely to go on for some time yet.
The treatment of people at the border is not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, Bossong concluded.
Apparently, there is a "growing normalization of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole has not taken a stand against it, this is at the expense of fundamental rights.
This development also weakens the unity of the Union.
"It cannot make headway if a member state sets its mind on doing things its own way," as is currently the case with Poland, which does not even allow Frontex, the EU border protection agency, access to the border.
In addition, the EU is paying a further price for its policy at the border with Belarus, according to Bossong: A basic agreement on asylum policy has become more difficult to achieve, as the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to Poland's border guard, meanwhile, migrants have again tried to enter Polish territory via Belarus.
Fifty-five migrants were arrested overnight Saturday and returned to the border, a spokeswoman for the agency said Sunday.
The Polish officials were pelted with stones by the migrants near the town of Czeremsza.
According to reports, a soldier was hit in the face and had to be medically treated by a military doctor.
A total of 52 attempted border crossings were registered within 24 hours.
On Friday evening, a group of 28 migrants had already broken through the border fences.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan have crossed or tried to cross the border between Belarus and the EU in recent months.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko of being the power behind the throne in Minsk, having lured him with the promise of travel to the EU.
According to reports, Poland and Lithuania have set up border checkpoints.
The EU sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that brought migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU commissioners travelled to the countries of origin of the people to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU's response was the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"The EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its resolve with hard tariffs and extraterritorial sanctions."
Minsk must also take into account the domestic political costs.
The Belarusian society is probably not set up to allow the security apparatus to routinely sweep thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes protests after controversial Formula 1 finale
Mercedes believe Max Verstappen committed two rule breaches during the race.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has lodged an appeal.
The silver arrows suspect two rule breaches in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to a supposed infringement by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull in the last Safety Car phase, when he is said to have illegally overtaken.
A second protest was lodged against the classification at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed.
Verstappen overtook Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes on the last lap to take his first Formula 1 title.
The manoeuvre was carried out shortly after the end of a safety car phase, in which the Dutchman had been overtaken by the car in front.
I'll check that.
I'm speaking with the bank and I'll get back to you
Thanks for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park hosts SC Freiburg fantag
The Europa-Park, the namesake of the Europa-Park Stadions of the Sport-Club Freiburg, has invited the SC Freiburg Fantag.
The park announced that members and season ticket holders of the Sport-Club from the Breisgau as well as members of the fan community could visit the Europa-Park for free on this day.
In addition, there were coupons for drinks and sausages.
On this day, the roller coasters were lit up in red and white.
Fuchsle, the Euromouse and many red and white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," the park said.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park, located in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has existed since the early 1990s.
The first SC Freiburg Fantag at Europa-Park once again showed how well the partnership fits.
Seeing the radiant fans having fun together on the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not €1699 as originally?
Steps in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman takes his first world championship title with Red Bull in his seventh season in Formula 1.
His path to the top of the king class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen lost the kart world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen leaves him at a petrol station on the way back, annoyed.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, collects the teenager in the car as it drives away.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team got a promising young driver in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He then went on to race in European Formula 3.
2015, Australia: Verstappen made his Formula One debut aged 17 years and 166 days, becoming the youngest driver in history to start a Grand Prix.
Due to a defect, he had to prematurely retire his Toro Rosso in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen was the youngest driver to score points in Formula 1 at the age of 17 years and 180 days.
Verstappen finished seventh in Sepang at the Malaysian Grand Prix.
2016, Spain: Verstappen wins his first race for Red Bull.
At 18 years and 228 days, he becomes the youngest Formula 1 Grand Prix winner in history at the 2008 Spanish Grand Prix.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his pole position in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At the age of 21, he left behind Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes team-mate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen, 24, won his first Formula 1 world title at the season-ending Abu Dhabi Grand Prix with a overtake on Hamilton in the final lap. dpa
I had #NUMBER# already had a huge argument with you when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# chest of drawers.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "At Home"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord", author Judith Hermann read from her current novel "At Home" at the sold-out Blue Note on Friday and served as a moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house by the coast and listens sensitively to the night noises at her front door.
I filled in the returns form yesterday but didn't get a confirmation email or anything.
My question is whether my request has been received.
Not everyone has the time for your preachy chat and cheap crap from China.
Their mistake, which they fix and not all of ours.
Contact Ms #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We chatted yesterday and agreed that I or Mrs #NAME# would receive an email with a £60 voucher, a repeat order of the #PRS_ORG# night table and a return label.
This email has not been received.
The package wants to bring #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Best regards
The LokSound 5 decoder can play up to 10 channels at the same time.
Each channel can be decoded up to 16 bits / 31250 kHz and offers finally HiFi quality on your installation.
It is practically indistinguishable from the original.
A Class-D audio power amplifier with up to 3W output drives the speakers, which must have an impedance of between 4 and 32 ohms.
The huge 128 Mbit sound buffer provides plenty of capacity.
All individual noises can be adjusted individually in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a fixed route plan allows the exact simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three independently adjustable brake functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
But sorry, because he says he's not anti-Semitic, that doesn't mean anything.
It's like when a foreigner says he doesn't have anything against foreigners.
Neither of them will admit to it.
But Kollegah constantly reproduces anti-Semitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself, then you should just do it completely.
Yes, wow, then you're just as unserious as Kollegah.
Anyone who takes evolution seriously is completely lost.
Somehow a god got it all started.
But once you become a creationist, you have to believe that the Earth is 10,000 years old and that science is full of lies.
And that makes you an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously as Kollegah
To get the best field of view, the lens should be as close as possible to the eye.
The specially designed aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the microscope practically free from spherical and chromatic aberrations right up to the edge zone.
Magnifying loupes are often marked with magnification numbers.
However, these figures only apply to precisely defined conditions, which rarely correspond to the practical conditions of use.
In order to make the most of your loupe, we ask you to pay attention to the information in the table "Technical data" (see instructions for use in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the lens surfaces of all optical devices, including telescopes.
By applying an anti-reflection coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
With optimal usage conditions - the lens close to the eye - reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable.
Further information can be found in the accompanying user manual (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Lupe Scheckkartenlupe Vergrößerung Taschenlupe Leselupe Lesehilfe
Whether as a reading aid on the go or simply for everyday tasks: the Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal companion, as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its handy format.
And their hard layer makes them robust against special stresses of the old age.
Each loupe comes with a credit card case for storage and safe transport.
They offer these parts, which you can see in the pictures or under "What we offer."
What condition is the item in?
Of course, everyone can make a mistake once, because no one is free of errors - should this ever be the case, just write a message and it will be resolved to full satisfaction (either by exchange, partial refund or full refund).
They receive a proper invoice.
It is always sent, unless otherwise requested by the buyer, insured with tracking number via DHL!
Please note that the individual shipping costs are taken from the above shipping conditions.
There are no further handling costs.
ok, everyone says it's authorized, how can I check it more precisely?
Yes, both email addresses
#PRS_ORG# will do very nice and good service, though it took until one got to a person, you were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already reported to you under the customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it used to.
They cannot deliver to #PRS_ORG# from England.
Christmas tree sales in Schönwolde: In the municipality of Krembz, women are looking for Christmas trees
Farmer Frank Diers has already experienced some strange situations when selling Christmas trees.
In one case, a man was even sent home without his partner because they could not agree.
Every year, he plants about 2,000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced some strange situations.
That makes the run-up to Christmas always a bit funny, he says.
And with the voucher?
Otherwise I'm out as a customer?!
After all, I received a defective delivery and now paid the full price for it.
Then I will also evaluate it accordingly!
We do not need to discuss the better court here, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating spit.
And both have their names.
In German, an equivalent might be something like the "Dreher," which doesn't sound nearly as tasty.
Problems with fibre + Devolo DLan/Magic
We've had a new fibre optic connection in the house for a few weeks now.
Unfortunately, I have problems building a stable Wi-Fi network.
Previously I had a DSL 50 Mbit connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent at 50 Mbit without any problems.
The new fibre optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLan module connected to the FritzBox also receives these.
However, the other DLan module, which sends the wifi, does not send out the full 500, but the further away I am from the module in the house, the less comes (so use a socket that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This leads to the fact that the Internet with the new fiber optic connection is now even slower on the first floor than before (~45 Mbit).
I also ordered a new Devolo Magic set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but here too there were similar losses.
Could someone explain why so much internet speed is "lost" over the power line?
And is LAN really the solution?
It would be extremely expensive to run LAN cables through the house.
I'm really desperate, so I've created an account just for this.
Therefore, I would appreciate a reply even more.
When it's time to change your giro account
Who would have thought that now there would be peace at the Giro accounts, is deceived.
While many banks have used the autumn to confirm to their customers the fee hikes of the past with all kinds of tricks, the grace periods for negative interest rates are also shrinking.
For example, Deutsche Bank was considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros for a long time.
Now she has simply halved the allowance and even quartered the daily rate.
In the first step, the limit was lowered only for customers of the Postbank subsidiary - to 50,000 euros for current and investment accounts and 25,000 euros for savings accounts.
But the lower thresholds now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, a spokesman confirmed in response to a request.
And not only for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros, which still applies, as does that of ING Deutschland.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has reduced the lump sums in two stages, initially to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks have, according to figures from the Internet portal Verivox, a free allowance of 25,000 euros or less.
The Sparda Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centres, which won their case in the first instance at the Berlin Land Court.
Now banks are discussing whether they should set aside reserves - in the event that the higher courts also declare the negative interest rates to be unlawful and that many millions of bank customers must be paid back.
Instead of the table for 6 people, they delivered the table for 8 people.
The sofa bed is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston has a whole beauty army
She is now officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are like a roller coaster ride.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was voted the most influential woman of the year by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter".
For her, the success in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of her series "The Morning Show" was first and foremost the result of a lot of discipline and work.
To look the part, a whole army of assistants, stylists and trainers are on hand.
After all, says Aniston, treat yourself to a chip a day (yes, read that again: one CHIP out of the bag).
That they still manage to win the hearts of both female and male fans is actually a miracle.
Maybe because she's just unlucky with the luck - and still looking for that special someone.
And the baby wish has been crossed off the list.
She was constantly asked when she would become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people asking me this have no idea what's going on with me personally medically, why I can't.
It was really hurtful.
Let's hope that success and fame are happy too.
A disgraceful end to a career: Räikkönen has to give up
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 has been quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn pulled off his gloves and wiped sweat from his forehead.
That was it.
After a driving error and a slight brush with the wall, Räikkönen had to retire from the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix after not even half of the race distance.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" retires from Formula One at the top of his game.
His wife Minttu and the two children also travelled to the United Arab Emirates for his farewell.
Räikkönen's greatest success was winning the 2007 World Championship in a Ferrari.
He won 21 Grand Prix races, started 18 times from pole and finished on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup victory - Nolte wins in two-man bob - Sport
The Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Bjørndalen's record of 94 successes is the target of the bob pilot.
"I calculated that I would need nine and a half wins per season to make it to Cortina in 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who recorded two successes in two days at the races in Winterberg.
He first defended against Johannes Lochner's attack by five hundredths of a second on Saturday, moving up from third place.
Then he changed something in the material setting and drove away on Sunday with a 0.30-second lead.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he beat the Briton Brad Hall.
Third place went to the Austrian Benjamin Maier.
"We took a bigger risk today and it paid off," said Friedrich, who also extended his winning streak to 22.
Johannes Lochner, who drives for Stuttgart, came from second place to fifth this time.
Christoph Hafer from the BC Bad Feilnbach landed in fourth place in the first race and in eighth place.
"If I knew what he was doing differently, I would do the same," said Lochner.
Nolte wins at home - podium for Jamanka
On the women's side, Laura Nolte picked up her third World Cup win of the season in the two-woman bob.
After finishing fourth in the Monobob the day before, she teamed up with Deborah Levi to win the World Cup on Sunday.
Olympic two-man bob champion Mariama Jamanka from the BRC Thüringen came in second place with Germany's fastest sprinter Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
She added the first podium of the season to her Olympic qualification.
The Wiesbadener Kim Kalicki landed in third place with Leonie Fiebig.
For me it was supercool, first World Cup podium, I'm superhappy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I'm super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasised: "It is not only pushing, but there is also a lot to do around here."
Jamanka was a little annoyed about the not-quite-flawless runs, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I already had the blanket in my shopping cart and could buy it now!!!
What should I do?
I haven't received it yet, so I haven't been able to redeem it, which is why I finally asked.
Last year, due to Corona, I had other problems and never had time for it.
And now it was said that he had expired, which made me very angry.
Look in the chat, it was about the Asare chair.
I would like to return it and then order again, as it is currently reduced :)
Why is shipping only starting on March 16?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I tip do I get an extra field with the message
Her colleague took it away yesterday.
Why it's a problem today
I have also sent you pictures of the wrong item delivered.
But we still want the shelf module, a new, undamaged one.
And not to cancel the whole order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello dear lovely girls and women,
I have a lot of things I want to write and maybe one or the other will also...
I'm 24, have PTBS, full-time student, and dog mom - aside from the fact that my dog doesn't bark or go to kindergarten, he's basically 1 to 1 with me.
My boyfriend (6 years together) is sick, he got a 2nd degree burn on Monday and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
Yesterday I visited him because I have emotional needs too, and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him with the shower (because his hand is in a cast due to a burn).
He is also cooled and we see each other less (1-2x a week) which is very hard on my needs for affection and love.
My dog-child has just been sick, I cooked for him and now he's lying in his cuddle blanket and has calmed down a bit after I had the heat lamp and petted him.
I live alone with my sister and my mother, and she's away for a month.
Now we also have housework to do, which we share out.
But cooking for myself is just so much work...
My PTBS illness is currently well managed, I'm about half-way through therapy and I'm coping.
Not good, but I'm coping and I'm almost symptom-free.
My uni is asking for a lot (for me), tomorrow at 3pm I have a written test for which I haven't prepared anything, and tomorrow I have an anatomy class for which I should at least prepare a bit.
And next week I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes after that is on my calendar and not in my head because there's no room for it.
So my week goes: just until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But after that, what happens?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the beginning of the school year.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just stressed out enough that I need these mental cues because otherwise I just can't figure it out.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic," but I can't do it any other way...
Do you feel the same way?
Ehrlich, I am infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I can't really put into words how grateful I am.
I don't know if I would have survived my kptbs otherwise.
I think it has a lot to do with the mental load that women have and so I thought I would find kindred spirits here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I received my order today unfortunately the whole other colour plus surface is scratched and the table has a mark.
In the first delivery, the colour was exactly as on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we change the table now, I'll get another color or what?
The cancellation email was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
However, it is not confirmed.
Something completely different: I noticed at the time that many religious teachers did not believe in God and for them it was just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it has always been a bit strange, maybe because I was brought up as a Christian and so I have always believed in some way.
How do you feel about that?
Maybe you can tell about co-workers or classmates with different attitudes.
In general, I understand the difference between private and professional life and it makes sense to keep them separate.
It also has a curriculum, etc.
But it would be strange to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in relativity.
So why would you want to teach religion if you don't believe in it?
Culture preserve or something?
I hope this question is not too personal.
Can it be changed or not? I would like to write in English, I understand it well
That's been a long time, and I'd rather not
That's good, thank you.
I expect to hear back from him soon, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thanks for your support #NAME#.
Help with film search
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it was a film for teenagers.
The film has two time periods (or parallel worlds).
On the one hand, the modern (the real world).
On the other hand, the past (or the realm of the dead) (not quite sure).
Because I can't describe it any better in the real world, there's a young woman.
And in the land of the dead, a young soldier (uniform similar to those of the soldiers from the Curse of the Caribbean).
For some reason, the paths cross and a plot is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the Reich of the Dead who wants to bring the woman into the Reich so that she can live there, I mean.
I think the transition is also the soldier's grave.
In the end, I think both soldiers are fighting each other.
If that means anything, I'm grateful for any response.
Our little one has only slept on her back since week 1.
Fast forward: lives still :D
Relax.
A child can do more than you think.
Make sure everything is in order, no cuddly toys, go in and check more often but no minute monitoring.
That's crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Ah, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always a blanket.
Watch your child when they sleep.
Does it turn the head to the side?
Can it be turned around from the inside?
Or is it face-down on the mattress?
That's how you can tell if everything is in order.
We've all grown up, and when my husband was born, it was just normal that you put the kids on your tummy to sleep.
In addition, we are already "regular customers" with you and have already bought many articles
But why are you only offering me 20 euros?
Hello, I have already written to a colleague of yours yesterday and have not yet received a reply.
It's about my wardrobe, which arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right drawer doesn't fit in the cabinet.
I ask you to contact me as soon as possible.
The cabinet is currently not in use.
To be clear,
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know that not everything can be kept.
And I had a lot of fun with RBTV.
It's just that the politics of this network are now so toxic.
Almost every format is sponsored (ok), but then go on a big begging tour.
It was said that one was an "independent" internet broadcaster.
Arno quotes: "We don't want to be a running water tap."
What am I now?
An 0815 advert trying to sell his BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's do's and don'ts.
The rules, of course, apply to everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
They can of course continue to offend people.
A Krogmann with no empathy whatsoever, trying to make a buck off the action with the rented rooms that blew up.
How can one find the good in all of this?
Terrible if you like it, I find it horrible.
I request a refund as the delivered table is defective.
A body breach caused by the damaged delivery of the #PRS_ORG#.
Whether as a comforter for stomach ache or simply for cuddling - my little heat-loving friend is versatile.
Cherry-seed cushions are a traditional household remedy for soothing heat applications, as cherry seeds absorb heat very well and release it in a dosed manner.
The removable inner cushion can be easily warmed in the microwave or in the oven.
The soft touch makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones feel safe even if they are not feeling so well.
The cherry seed cushion with a cover is only suitable for the following applications:
Before warming the nipple, check for unusual smells, splinters or burn marks and dispose of immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the cover before heating!
In the microwave at max. 300 watts for max. 2 minutes (microwave manufacturer's instructions to be followed!)
Immediately after heating, the heat is evenly distributed throughout the blanket by shaking!
Then place the inner cushion back into the cover.
During the first heating, there may be a slight moisture build-up on the surface, but this will disappear after repeated applications.
Always follow the specified heating instructions, as longer periods or higher energy levels can lead to damage (ignition and fire hazard!).
Before heating the kisses in the microwave, check that the manufacturer's instructions allow the heating of cereal products.
After the heated inner cushion has been placed back into the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for babies (max. 43°C) on your arm!
Do not use the pillow if you have acute or chronic, inflammatory or feverish diseases, circulatory complaints, fresh haemorrhages, bleeding or open wounds, or if you have reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have a history of skin, heart, vein, diabetes or tumor disease, or if you are pregnant, please consult a doctor before use.
If seams are open and loose kernels are leaking, dispose of the product and loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is used on babies under 1 year of age, the temperature of the baby should be monitored regularly during application to avoid overheating!
Any serious incidents associated with the product should be reported to the manufacturer and the relevant authority in the country where the user is based.
The cover is removable and washable at 30°C.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt second after Hinserie - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of returning to the Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 are working their way out of the relegation zone.
Ingolstadt is also not doing well under the third coach.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top game, joy in Hanover over the interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the failed start under the new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery dead?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) would no longer charge from my power supply.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that a power supply alone would be enough to get it up and running.
Uh-oh, the battery is dead and the laptop won't turn on even with the AC adapter plugged in.
So I removed the battery, but nothing happens.
Maybe you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use my laptop on AC power?
Is there anything else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I want to have the #PRS_ORG# delivered to my room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But he doesn't know how high the seat is...
Often on tour and still a lot of equipment?
No problem with the Everyday V2 Backpack from Peak Design.
The 20-litre capacity is big enough to swallow even larger photo kit, which can be safely stowed using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what you need for everyday items is well organized and separated from the photo equipment thanks to practical access points in the individually configurable interior.
With the "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2), the series is also presented in a new look.
The sleek, minimalist design speaks for itself - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack while still providing quick access to photo equipment.
This can be done in two ways: either conventionally via the lid flap, which can be closed with the MagLatch closure system, or an ingenious solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in Messenger Bags.
There is a metal hook on the flap with a matching D-ring on the front of the rucksack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has considered different "fill levels": there are four anchor bars, stitched in place, into which the closure hooks can be threaded.
If the rucksack is fully loaded, you simply take the top bar, if it is rather empty, you take the lower one.
The flap and the hook are also magnetic.
This way, the rucksack can also be reliably closed without the hook getting stuck.
The second option distinguishes the Everyday Backpack fundamentally from other photo backpacks: In addition to the cover flap, there is also a zipper opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest disadvantage of conventional backpacks with top access - you don't have to dig through the contents anymore!
At the same time, this clever detail increases the everyday usability of the rucksack enormously: If you don't just take your photography equipment, but also everyday items or travel luggage.
The Everyday Backpack allows you to configure the interior individually (more on that below) so that you can store both items separately and access them independently through the two side openings.
You can also pull the rucksack from the right side in front of the body to access the camera equipment in the right main pocket, while the everyday items remain safely in the left side pocket and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, uncomplicated adjustable straps help.
And as the outer shell of the rucksack is also made from 100% recycled, waterproof nylon, the contents remain dry even if it rains in Scotland in the autumn.
Unfortunately, I am waiting in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email confirming the assignment
The forwarding company has announced that it will contact the customer to collect the wrongly delivered table.
I haven't heard anything since.
I ask for immediate action.
I am now writing to the third support staff member, none of whom have got me any further than a promise that I will receive an email as confirmation.
It is the return of the incorrectly delivered Custom #NAME#
When will the wardrobe be delivered again?
Keeping him like this is not an option for me...
It works.
Many thanks for the help
Wishing you a good evening
hallo, meine bestellnummer ist #NUMBER#. wann wird der Artikel geliefert?
The order and payment was on 12.1.21.
I received a completely different lamp than I ordered
Please call me
If you extend my gift certificate, I'll place a larger order right away, but at least I kept the damaged piece of furniture and didn't send it back.
And that the past year turned out to be different from what I had expected could not have been anticipated, and I was not able to resolve and clarify it in a timely manner.
But the damage I took as a customer, I can't accept that.
Rotinger brake discs are designed for the demands of the dynamic driver, who appreciates reliability and safety when braking, even under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then mechanically worked (drilled and cut).
All cut discs are manufactured in short series according to individual technical characteristics, which are specific for certain discs and patterns.
On the basis of the individual technical drawing, a special production program is created, which is aimed at balancing the disc according to the properties of the original mounting.
The discs produced in this way ensure high comfort and brake effectiveness.
The additional openings increase the effectiveness of the cooling of the disc, while the slots improve the cleaning of the brake discs and brake pads.
The aesthetic properties of our painted discs underline by their attractive and striking appearance the character of every car.
Coloma is the place where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man at the southern fork of the American River discovered glowing rocks in the water.
Although he tried to keep his discovery secret, the news spread quickly and triggered the so-called "California Gold Rush" of 1849.
Thousands came from near and far to make Coloma one of the fastest growing and most prosperous cities in the state.
Areas were staked out, tents pitched, and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted to share in the wealth of the country.
For many it was "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or bankruptcy)!
In this game you are a pioneer seeking wealth in the West and making a name for yourself.
You'll be looking for gold, recruiting workers, rounding up horses, and building businesses.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding river valleys and adjacent areas.
You're not alone - the other pioneers apparently have the same idea!
You have to out-innovate your peers to avoid going out of business with the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
You choose your actions simultaneously, you have to manage your resources and build a tableau that works more and more for you (so-called "engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to become more efficient, to gain additional actions or to apply rules in your favor.
With these buildings and dynamic bridge tiles, you can develop your own unique playing style.
Coloma covers a period of three years from 1848 (the year gold was discovered at Coloma), through 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush) to 1850 (the year California achieved statehood).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the board where they can perform actions.
Then their choices are revealed and they place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it gets a lock!
This deactivates one half of the site - reducing the possible actions there.
Players then take turns performing actions such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up camps, searching rivers, building bridges, opening shops, and positioning gunfighters.
When all the actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The auctioneer rotates to a new location at the beginning of each round, changing the available actions.
This continues until the auctioneer has moved the pointer five times, so that each location has been hidden once and the year ends.
There is a shootout where the players must defend Coloma from a gang of angry bandits.
If the players have enough gunfighters and are numerically superior to the bandits, they get rewards.
However, if they fail, they will receive lower rewards or end up in the cemetery.
The game ends after the third shot, then the final score is determined.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free delivery, I accept up to the dimensions of 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm, parcel delivery (folded games).
In all other cases, DPD is usually insured and with tracking (played on a single sheet, wrapped in flypaper and with packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can send you a cardboard sleeve for an extra 2 Euros, which will not come into contact with the CD.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW psychological abuse, sexual abuse, power abuse
The ARD documentary has now appeared in my Twitter timeline, and I have watched it.
Dr. Michael Winterhoff, a child psychiatrist, is a popular guest on talk shows and gives lectures throughout Europe.
With his book "Why Our Children are Tyrannical" (2008), he sparked a heated debate on parenting.
Former patients and caregivers are now making serious allegations against him.
Please be careful, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
Our parents and other responsible adults should never, never, never, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever
Our goal must always be to give the child space to develop and to make the framework as large as possible, given the situation.
Brrr, it still shakes me.
Hoeltschek: Countries advise on scrapping test requirement for triple-vaccinated
The health ministers of the Länder will decide at their next meeting on a nationwide abolition of the testing requirement for triple-vaccinated people.
"We need to get clarity quickly as to whether and when the test obligation for those who have been vaccinated three times can be dispensed with," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the Conference of Health Ministers, who told Bild am Sonntag.
The removal of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically sensible, but also provides an additional vaccination incentive," said Holetschek.
Federal Health Minister Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has promised that he will "make a proposal to the health ministers' conference on Tuesday". - afp
So I want to send the lamp back
How should I go about this?
Hello, I find the #PRS_ORG# chair very nice, however I cannot see how high the seat is.
Can you help me out?
I can no longer shop through my #PRS_ORG#.
Report: Ups, there was a mistake.
Shopping through the #PRS_ORG# site on the computer.
I updated my account information.
What could be the reason for this?
What you describe is called *awareness* - the sense of being aware of one's surroundings while under general anesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1000.
The most common experience is hearing sounds/voices, less commonly seeing pictures, and very rarely feeling pain.
For this topic relevant: Caesarean sections are operations that are associated with an increased rate of awareness, as one avoids a very deep anesthesia to protect the child until birth.
Previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned during the preoperative discussion.
Certain anaesthetic procedures, such as total intravenous anaesthesia (TIVA), are associated with a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Love you all, this comment of mine is correct, however** u/Nitemarex **did not.
I misread her comment.
But the chair is defective.
Unfortunately, the 20 euros won't help us either.
These are statutory warranty claims.
The absolute minimum would be to take the broken chair back.
This is in addition to the legal obligation and is a standard in the eCommerce area.
Please check again to see if they have at least returned the broken chair.
We then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I have already sent you an email that you have not responded to.
Again, the question.
The order and the invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The courier is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
They told me they only deliver to the front door - because of #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I'll have to cancel the order as I don't know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture up the stairs.
Will I not be called?
I had a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle died at the age of 97
He has specialised as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later he wrote a monumental theatre history.
On Friday, Günther Rühle, aged 97, died.
There's still the new book on the table, freshly printed: "An old man gets older."
The shocking diary of a slow goodbye to the world, kept by the theatre historian and journalist Günther Rühle until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading, comes the news that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I am here to testify to my life's worth."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common is the Europallet, a standardised wood pallet that is primarily used as a load carrier in the European region.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association EPAL
According to data from Statistics Austria, more than 10 million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
How many pallets are imported into Austria each year is not recorded
New York wins first MLS championship
New York City FC won the first MLS title.
After a 1-1 draw in regulation time against the host Portland Timbers, the Eastern Conference team won the final 4-2 on penalties.
In the Eastern Conference finals, New York beat Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I had many great tips last week for the perfect goulash.
That was at Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and buttery!
So thank you again :)
Now I've got the taste for it and want to cook rouladen for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow I will start a beef fund.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
What happens now?
What happened to my books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English is not as good as it used to be, but I'll get it back
The case is about a refund of €#NUMBER#
I was already informed by email on 18.01. that the refund had been processed.
But to this day, the money has not been paid to me.
Please check that.
Where there is still Christmas roast in Lübeck
For many people, goose or duck are part of Christmas like the Christmas tree and gifts.
Have you not yet purchased any poultry?
Now time is running out.
We are telling you where you can still get a Christmas roast in the region of Lübeck.
The "drive" of a tube power amp is a major contributor to the heat and fat content of a guitar amplifier sound.
These features are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can set the desired level and the amount of distortion of your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers offer a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the volume without changing the "Gain" or distortion.
Further up, it was already clear that you can even float a power reserve with the POWER LEVEL regulator when things get really loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL regulator, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in any situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line output.
The signal here is processed with a box simulation, so that you get an eminent "acoustic" sound impression even with headphones or direct recordings.
A CD or MP3 player can be plugged into the AUX jack so you can jam to your favorite tunes.
There's also a tuner built in - you don't need a separate tuner.
If you add a VFS5 footswitch, you can easily access sounds, turn effect blocks on and off, and tap the tempo of compatible effects.
For the live performance, this is actually indispensable.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But others have done it.
Then there is the possibility to send the lamp back?
Because it's too low for over a dining table?
So I would like to send them back.
Can you help me with that?
And the dresser?
Will we get another update on the exact delivery date in the next few weeks?
Hello, have they already sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
If it doesn't work out, I'd be happy with a legacy or gift voucher.
I might find a buyer for the furniture.
More than 1,000 euros for goods I don't need are then a bit much.
I just received my delivery and would have liked to know if screws were included in the delivery.
I would like to mount the #PRS_ORG# Spiegel (mirror) on the provided hook.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait hasn't paid off
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear talks
According to Iranian reports, progress is being made in negotiations to revive the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are close to reaching an agreement on the issues on the agenda," Iran's chief negotiator Ali Bagheri said on Sunday to the state news agency Irna.
This was a "positive and important development" because there had not even been agreement on the issues to be negotiated at first.
The agreement is meant to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, Vienna talks to revive the agreement had resumed after a one-week break.
Negotiators from Iran, Germany, Britain, China, France and Russia are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also present in Vienna, but only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Thuringia is now a federal state with the highest corona incidence
Thuringia has replaced Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
The only federal state is above the mark of 1000.
Thuringia was the only federal state to exceed the 1,000 mark on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute reported a seven-day value of 1,025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which has always shown the highest incidence rate in the country, this figure was 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly lower, but was still above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2,242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus were reported within one day, and 16 more deaths were reported in connection with an infection.
On Sunday, 200 people suffering from Covid-19 were treated in intensive care units in hospitals.
On weekends, there can be delays in reporting.
In addition, the health authorities have been overstretched for weeks and are hardly able to catch up with new cases.
I understand that.
As the delivery is not until the beginning of March, it may be possible until then.
I have to print it out and stick it on the package and drop it off at the post office, right?
Here I don't have to click/fill anything else?
I don't want that to happen, so I'm writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return at my own expense.
The 8 euro return fee is outrageous in my opinion.
It's time for change
###Greetings from the Bundestag, I am u/StratorDE in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
Why is the post here?
If you look at the activity in the past months of the Bundestag, you can see that it is not existing.
We've been in a winter slump and have stretched out the summer hole for a few months.
What is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
For the most part, it's just a reflection of the dissatisfaction with how things have turned out and how we're generally perceived.
In the last few days, it has become increasingly apparent that many here still have a real interest in the Bundestag.
What we need to change
Here, the community around the Bundestag is asked to keep it alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who has become aware of this project in the last few days and has found, to put it simply, a mess.
After some back and forth, several people in the community have expressed interest in rebuilding the project.
However, I would like to call on everyone again to get involved, only then can this project also have a future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, where we can exchange ideas and work on concrete things.
You can join the server through this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag work in the future?
* What existing orders need to be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How do we create a fair election system?
I'm pretty sure I forgot something, but that's okay, we have Discord at the end of the day.
If you have the time and the will, come to the Discord, work with us, and let's democratically decide the future.
I have ordered a lampshade for you that is still to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for my taste.
For that, I have already ordered a different suspension from you.
I put it together and noticed this when I took the soft foam.
Very sad about that.
I hope this is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also pretty sad, as #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have one question: the day cover #PRS_ORG#, is it also available in oversize, i.e. 240/240 for example?
#PRS_ORG# must guarantee that the faulty cupboard is collected as soon as possible.
And I ask you to do it now.
I don't have a suitable box, but I will dismantle the wardrobe as far as possible for collection - they will need to discuss with #PRS_ORG# how this can be done.
#PRS_ORG# can be contacted at any time to arrange a collection.
Is there an instruction manual?
How long would I have to wait to get them or decide whether to return them?
How do they answer the question why they are vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague I really like.
She herself has been a vegetarian for a while, and currently eats meat only very rarely.
I myself was a vegetarian for some years.
When asked if I had always wanted to be vegan and vegetarian a planned step, I answered honestly without much thought.
And that I had long thought that as a vegetarian I was supporting animal welfare, but eventually reflected and understood that I was ultimately supporting animal cruelty.
That's why I've decided to become vegan.
At that moment I got the impression that on her side there was discontent, she then defended vegetarianism and said she knew where her meat came from and as a vegetarian she reduced animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer to "plump" was?
How do they answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan I get cornered quickly and conflicts arise without me having to make an issue of it.
It greets a harmony-loving vegan (;
It is not an exception under § 312d BGB.
Your #PRS_ORG# does not absolve you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I am not at the assigned date and time to pick up my return at #PRS_ORG#.
Since I can't be there for a funeral, I can't change that either.
Can I please be given an alternative collection time?
From 01.02.#NUMBER# I will be available again continuously.
Lahnstein's rescue service is well-equipped: 45,000 euro grant from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Minister of the Interior, Roger Lewentz, handed over a grant decision in the amount of 45,000 euros to the Oberbürgermeister of Lahnstein, Peter Labonte, for the new water rescue vehicle of the volunteer fire department of Lahnstein.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in service since November 2020, was 135,000 euros.
A good and important investment in security.
I am pleased that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us in this project," says Lahnsteins Oberbürgermeister Peter Labonte.
The equipment wagon is used by the diving team Lahnstein, one of a total of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Above and below water, they perform tasks in water and ice rescue and technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are permanently counting on rising numbers: The boom of the hotel shipping on the Rhine and Moselle as well as the further increasing use of the Lahn as a recreational waterway contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read at 10%, and then the problems started.
I can't open the book.
However, I followed her recommendations and synchronized, removed and reloaded the app NOTHING has worked.
I'm a little frustrated because this has taken a lot of time and I'm hoping for help.
Okay, then.
I would like to order 3 articles from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a delivery date during the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard, the previously mentioned values were measured in the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% humidity and with the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
The values can vary depending on the flashlight used, age and environment.
*: The burn time in the bright level includes the burn time with reduced brightness due to the overheating protection.
2) Dealers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors where they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support using the Fenixlight Limited 'Warranty Card' and either a commercial invoice or receipt.
Fenix will provide our authorized dealers with the technology and parts necessary to service our luminaires.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a new product within 15 days of purchase due to manufacturing defects if problems occur during normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
If the model is discontinued, customers get a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repair for 5 years: Fenix offers a free repair within 5 years from the purchase date for lamps if a problem occurs during normal use.
Different warranty periods for different products:
Except for the products and accessories listed above, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product warranty.
3) Limited lifetime warranty: For lights that have exceeded the free warranty period for repairs, we offer lifetime repairs, but charge a fee for parts.
The retailer tells the customer the cost of the part before the repair is carried out.
4) Warranty certificate: Customers can demand customer service from Fenix retailers or retailers by presenting a completed Fenix warranty card, a sales receipt or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to customers and Fenix will support those services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damages or failures caused by:
Any defects or damages caused by improper use, including, but not limited to, use not in accordance with the warranty or the instructions in the product specifications.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head must not be dismantled, as this can damage the flashlight and make the warranty invalid.
Any defects or damages caused by other behaviors cannot be adequately controlled by Fenix.
6) In order to assert a warranty claim, please contact our warranty department with the following information: Name, type / model of the warranty object, serial number.
Thanks for stepping up to the plate on this one, I too spent almost a decade in the civil service in a similar role, so we were both armed officers in the executive, I won't go there!
The question of right and left always seems very simplified to me.
In principle, however, one should say that the civil servant is more likely to come from the liberal to conservative spectrum rather than from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
That is also true for special uniforms and weapon carriers, that people on the right of conservatism should be attracted by the magic of these people is also clear, that these people then of course have a hard time with the lived reality is also clear, because you have of course besides the average white, now many Germans with a migration background, women and also homosexuals (and here I do not mean the exaggerated feminine clichés, because there are in the executive rather less or not at all but quite normal men and women whom one does not notice if they do not tell it to you) and also on these people you can and must rely on, because in doubt you save your life or set this up for you.
But even these fringe groups, which sound funny at first, are conservative in my experience, meaning they are proud of Germany and feel more alienated by over-the-top left-wing politics, even though these policies supposedly benefit them or are meant to make things right for them, they just want to be treated like normal people.
Back to the rights, of course, the police and the armed forces are also a cross-section of society, and one will also find the extreme right there, but they are allowed to openly express their opinion there or even openly hatch any state-threatening plans in the media, which is completely exaggerated and annoys me.
Of course it happens that police officers and soldiers, who often have been deployed abroad, start to generalize and also say things that are controversial or politically incorrect.
It also happens that right-wing like-minded people meet and exchange ideas.
Nevertheless, I believe that this is well fought and also countered with political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so very international and that's a good thing in my opinion that we can't afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that the other basket I ordered in German.
Why would this come from England?
When I ordered it, it wasn't sold out.
I ordered in November.
But I was confirmed in this by your confirmation of the order
It's still about my order, which is no longer available.
I had previously chatted with #NAME#.
Alternatively, you could send me the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# Euros in black or is this basket available in Germany as well?
I always think of you as a partner company.
But on the edge of the timber there are two deep gouges filled with something yellow
and on the mirror itself there is a small scratch
Ordinary by child?
Hello, I have been dealing with a problem for a long time.
I am very disciplined and organised at work (I'm self-employed, with little free time), but for as long as I can remember I've struggled to keep my house clean and tidy.
There are always phases where nothing happens, and then and now I pack up and clean.
But it's really never "just in case someone drops in."
Unfortunately, my husband is (unfortunately) no better, it bothers me somewhere but mostly household simply loses against work and laziness.
The kitchen is cleaned regularly because we like to cook.
Now to my question, have you managed to become a decent parent?
We don't have one yet, but we're working on it and this question has been bothering me for a while.
Because for me, there is no incentive to clean it up, it just doesn't bother me so much as long as no visitors come and there's always fresh clothes and the kitchen is usable.
If you have a child, do you work harder, or do you slack off?
I look forward to hearing from you.
Exclusive, new, and high-quality and anatomically pre-formed cut offers maximum comfort, a perfect fit and so almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Pre-moulding with special, further shaping at the joints for improved mobility (arm and knee bends)
The Focea Comfort 4 has more than doubled the area covered by the Flex System 2 to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (shoulder, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-formed shapes in the lower back and instep provide a snug, perfect fit.
The Elaskin 8.8 Stretch Panel in the lumbar region increases flexibility around the back zipper and improves comfort, especially when bending and when mounting and deploying equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone, which is located around the shoulders and back, provides increased flexibility in arm and back movements.
Fireskin is a warm, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that offers a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the chest, it brings heat to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) face seal increases comfort, sealing and durability (separate head cover)
A soft, collar-like zone improves sealing with a fine-tunable width adjustment by a flexible, gentle-on-the-skin zipper that doesn't stick to the casing or seams
Double-zippered wrist and ankle cuffs connect a removable inner cuff with a soft, neoprene outer cuff
45° bend at the end of the inner cuff for increased elasticity and load-bearing when pulled up.
Long zipper at the neck with an elastic reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a hood
Langer G-Lock P back zipper (overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated Water Dam System for improved sealing (Beuchat patent)
Velcro fasteners on arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements at both ends of the zipper to prevent tearing if excessive force is applied.
Neoprene panels bonded together with outer and inner overlap
The edges of the outer straps are reinforced for greater load-bearing capacity
Edges of the inner manchetts beveled for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to fix the computer in place, especially for deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common wrist computers)
Career in social work - as someone with an insecure personality disorder?
I did an apprenticeship in the field of software development and have been working as a software developer for about a year now.
Unfortunately, I am realizing more and more that this profession is not the right one for me, which is why I have been thinking about starting again and studying social work for a long time.
The problem: I have an insecure (or fearful) personality disorder (IPD).
Basically, it means that I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a factual level, but it's very hard for me to have casual conversations and I've been told I come off as unapproachable (which I think I've gotten better at).
Can I become a social worker like this?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in an open youth centre, but rather in, for example, drug advice or family support.
But I don't know if the actual working day is really like I imagine it to be, and it's hard to find anything online about it.
The AVPS is already causing problems for me in my job (for me, emotionally), because every time there's a problem with my code ("just the simplest things go wrong") and it's hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should really know how to do this by now" / "I'm wasting his time with my stupid questions" / "he must think I'm really incompetent" etc.).
I'll probably have problems with this in every job but I wanted to mention it there.
But have you already got your sofa back?
There was no confirmation for that either.
I'm waiting for a collection appointment
What do they mean by return please!
If I download a book from the #PRS_ORG#, I get the message Your #PRS_ORG# does not authorize this book
Are there problems?
I was chatting with #PRS_ORG# and he asked me if I got a delivery confirmation for my shelf.
The protein ingested with the feed is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which are then used to build up the bird's own proteins, which it needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather renewal in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high demand on the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as this may cause disturbances in the breeding cycle.
Following this, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement) should be recommenced.
The protein ingested with the feed is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids), which are then used to build up the bird's own proteins, which it needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather renewal in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high demand on the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as this may cause disturbances in the breeding cycle.
Following this, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement) should be recommenced.
1 g NEKTON Bio per 250 ml water or 100 g soft food.
Only prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird needs per day and change the water/food daily.
A scraped measuring spoon (lying down) corresponds to 1 g of NEKTON Bio.
In severe feather damage, the double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be administered until the onset of feather regrowth is visible.
Thereafter, the normal dose is administered until the feather regrowth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON Bio should be stored dry, out of direct sunlight, between 15°C and 25°C.
Please forgive me, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can a desk chair break after 9 months?
The warranty period in Germany is 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hi, I sent an email on Monday to say that my order was damaged and photos were attached.
Did you receive this email?
A statement by a community worker in the appeal against the ordinance
Hi r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have a problem.
A walnut tree is to be felled on our property.
So a petition was submitted to the municipality.
A staff member has written to me to say that coppicing and the walnut are not part of the constitution.
However, the constitution explicitly states that the walnut tree is to be protected.
Can I now rely on the statement of the employee?
On the one hand, I have to rely on expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statute is clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then we'll use the new packaging for that.
I didn't get a message
Well, then I still have a sofo without use.
Could you offer me a bequest or a gift voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I think so, only the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the blanket delivered to Germany
Can you check that?
Breaking news: Serious traffic accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the B 2179 between the junction of Selb-Nord and Plößberg.
As the police press alarm currently reports (14:03), a car has come into the oncoming traffic while overtaking.
There are injuries.
Okay, I understand.
Well, thank you again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
Merry Christmas to you all!
Unfortunately, my Christmas is not very good, because my dear head is thinking about everything that can be thought of.
Before I go here now ... in short: I need advice and the best people to ask are those who know something about my situation - that's you.
I'm just doing the refereeing as a lateral move.
Originally I studied something else and worked in a different field (to remain somewhat anonymous, I won't say anything more specific here).
But then I got bored and looked for alternatives that would be more fun.
At some point I landed in teaching and was sure that this was it - even though the framework conditions are significantly less flexible than in my previous profession, but that didn't matter to me.
I'm now on my third "I'll just Google other job postings."
And it's only been half a year.
When I was painting before, I always decided to continue and at least finish the ref, after that I can still change my mind.
But I'm absolutely finished.
I've had so little free time in the last month that I'm completely exhausted.
Now, of course, it's the holidays, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the ref I always thought I was stress resistant, but my weekend was my weekend and my Friday night was my Friday night.
I was free.
And the stress at work was irrelevant in those moments.
Now, I can't even deal with my own family celebrations.
And then there are these rigid structures that make me nervous.
Basically it's fun and from the outside it looks like the referee is doing a good job, which is what the feedback is about.
But I am completely exhausted and wonder how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it isn't already.
I wonder if I want to have this for the rest of my working life - just when I read some of your contributions - or if I should go back to the old sector, where I was valued, where I could take time off when I needed it, where the work was a bit boring but I was paid fairly and where we worked as a team and not as a lone warrior as it is most of the time now.
But then I wonder if a year from now I won't be back in the same place, unsatisfied.
You know, it's all kind of weird, but maybe you, as an outsider, have some advice or ideas on how to get me out of this situation where I'm completely ready to cry at the drop of a hat.
I'm not going to make any decisions right now because it's probably not going to do anything good.
But maybe your views will help me to see at least a little light at the end of the tunnel - or to enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading and sorry for the whiny tone.
I hope my situation is at least a little clearer.
Since its introduction in 2001, the Valvetronix series from VOX has continued to evolve, leading to the combination of advanced modeling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly emulates the behavior of a tube amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we're introducing a brand new modeling engine that is absolutely state-of-the-art when it comes to sound.
Thanks to the VET technology (Virtual Element Technology), which is based on the analysis of the components and amplifier circuits, the VTX amplifiers offer an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
These amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix preamplifier.
This is partly based on real analogue circuitry, because these are able to reproduce the sound variations and nuances of a tube amplifier better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers offer a closed housing and a bass reflex system, from which the natural resonances bubble.
With the VOX Tone Room software, you can even correct and bend historical facts on the virtual plane, until the amp and effects sound just like you've always imagined.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modelling technology is mainly due to the 2001 introduction of the VOX Valve Reactor technology.
Of course, it has since been fine-tuned several times in order to meet the demands of new sound requirements, which in 2010 once again led to a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series - with more dynamics and a number of significantly improved amplifier models.
The new VT+ Valvetronix series is also designed so that all guitarists looking for maximum sound variety will find what they are looking for.
Every guitarist dreams of the pressure and dynamics of a tube amp: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced rendition of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During a detailed analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the final stage determines the tube character of a power amplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this discovery.
The Valve Reactor circuit of each VT+ amplifier, which is equipped with a 12AX7 tube, perfectly reproduces the subtle nuances and tonal character of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, Magic lose to Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to beat the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost 104-106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The main compartment is also adaptable: with three individually placable and foldable zipper pockets, it adapts to the needs of your photographic equipment and is therefore suitable for every kind of camera - from compact system cameras of all sizes to full-format reflex cameras.
What actually fits in the backpack, of course, depends on the size of the camera and the lenses.
One possible setup would be a DSLR camera with an attached lens, two or three telephoto lenses, and a remote flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the various models of the Sony a7 series or a Fuji X-T2 still leave room for further lenses.
In addition, there is plenty of room for all your accessories.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (Olympus MFT cameras, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) you can use the rucksack for your equipment and for non-photographic items.
Drone pilots will also make a good choice with the Everyday Backpack 20L, as the backpack offers enough space for a DJI Mavic Pro with remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: probably the longest in history
In the three months since the eruption began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused major damage.
Is an end in sight?
The eruption on La Palma has lasted for 85 days, making it the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island.
The eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585, which lasted 84 days, was previously thought to be the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous eruptions.
The activity of the unnamed volcano in the Cumbre Vieja has decreased in recent days, but volcanologists have continued to make no predictions as to when it might end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernández Zapata, to the state TV station RTVE.
Damage in millions
In the nearly three months since the eruption began, the more than 1,000-degree-Fahrenheit lava has destroyed more than 2,900 homes and other buildings, RTVE reported.
About 1200 hectares were covered by a meter-thick lava layer.
That's almost 1700 football pitches.
More than 7,000 residents had to be evacuated, and damage is estimated at more than 900 million euros.
Two new islands were created by cooled lava, each with an area of about 50 hectares.
The banana industry, which is of immense importance to the island, with about 85,000 inhabitants directly or indirectly dependent on it, was particularly hard hit by the eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, and further areas were severely affected, according to the newspaper "El País".
Christmas and gifts
Christmas is just around the corner and especially the children are looking forward to the heavenly feast.
The many colourful gifts under the Christmas tree have something seductive about them, connected with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that still bring our increasingly fragmented society together.
It is all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the act of giving, which according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss was a peace-making "contract of nature peoples," can escape the rigid routine and be re-enlivened in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became Santa Claus
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked Christmas with gift-giving.
Previously, gifts were exchanged on Christmas Day in one way or another.
The background to this still popular custom is that St Nicholas, as bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold into the windows of three women at night in order to save them from a life of sin.
This unconventional way of giving has led to the popular German custom of filling children's shoes with gifts.
Protestants objected to this practice because they reject the role of mediators between God and people as "venerating the saints."
For these reasons, they are hostile to the institution.
Martin Luther made St. Nicholas into the Christ Child and thus established a new tradition.
The focus of the gift shifted to Christmas Eve.
Since most Protestants no longer see such details as important, it only angers the few that the custom of St. Nicholas, like the custom of St. Martin, with St. Martin's songs and St. Martin's procession, is still a fixed part of the pre-Christmas season.
Today, slippers are found in front of the door and under the Christmas tree, from socks to coveted luxury watches, everything that the heart desires.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of giving on the day of Saint Nicholas since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving was moved to Christmas Eve.
However, in all Christian countries there is a cheerful muddle about who is going to bring the children their presents.
In Germany, it depends on the region whether the Christ Child appears on Christmas Eve or Santa Claus, who in principle is a kind of Saint Nicholas, to whom some features have been assigned over time.
This includes, for example, his white beard, which has little in common with the rather strict Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sledge, which is pulled by reindeer, and the preference for the fireplace to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Kings give gifts, while in Italy, Befana is said to have guided the Magi to the Christ Child.
In Scandinavia, trolls sometimes bring gifts, while in Russia, Father Frost brought some renown.
Here, it is not reindeer, but three horses that pull his sleigh.
In the Czech Republic, the birthplace of the Reformation during the Hussites' wars, the Christ Child is responsible for delivering the gifts.
I have been getting this error message for 3 weeks trying to download a new book, but my account and contact details are up to date:
Please help me to fix the problem, as I
Otherwise, you can buy another e-book #PRS_ORG#
I have been trying to get a return label for my order #NUMBER# last week and this morning.
I was told one would be sent to me.
Since I haven't received any (not even in the spam folder), I was wondering how long it usually takes.
Thank you very much.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near the Royal Palace
A man was shot dead by police near Kensington Palace in London on Saturday.
Police said callers reported a man with a gun going into a bank and a bookmaker's premises.
The man fled in a vehicle that was later stopped by officers.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was pronounced dead at the scene.
Police did not initially consider the incident to be terror-related.
Several embassies are located in the area around Kensington Palace.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
What are they?
No matter where I click, I'm immediately redirected to your site.
The decorative lamp fits harmoniously into every garden, patio or courtyard.
The light is simply placed and can be anchored in the ground with 2 ground spikes.
Integrated and powerful 0.4 Watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Maximum light duration of 10 hours.
The robust plastic housing is suitable for use outdoors all year round.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually threatening objects from distant galaxies that glow brightly on the inside.
"Smart Stone" is harmless, though: The sun alone is responsible for the fact that this solar lamp is fascinatingly bright - either in white or in coloured light (in six different colour tones).
The smooth, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: like a natural giant pebble, this modern light object is revealed in daylight.
Its organic shapes fit into any natural setting - on the edge of a terrace, in the lawn or in a rockery.
It also does well in the company of larger pebbles and stones, where it can assert itself thanks to its size.
You can save a lot of work: Smart Stone does not require wiring or batteries as a solar light.
Set the "beacon" in a sunny spot at any time of the day.
Two earth spikes are supplied to ensure a firm grip, if required.
The matt white plastic bottle itself is robust and weatherproof.
Its solar panel hides "Smart Stone" discreetly inside, together with its battery and two LEDs - one for white, the other for coloured light.
The battery starts to charge as soon as sunlight falls on the house.
When the sun goes down, Smart Stone lights up on its own, in whichever colour you choose: there are six attractive light colours to choose from, in addition to daylight white.
The switch-off is also automatic, once the battery charge level has fallen below a preset minimum, or when it becomes bright again.
Once the sun shines again, the charging cycle begins again the next day.
I've done that several times and it doesn't work.
A shame, I would have liked to continue to order from you, but if the voucher is not credited, then I will not order out of principle.
If you change your mind, let me know.
Otherwise, that was then the last contact.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
In the lockdown, no garden centre has been open....
The motor control of the LokSound 5 was again significantly improved.
A variable PWM frequency of 10kHz to 50kHz provides super-quiet operation for bell anchor motors - the typical "humming" is a thing of the past.
The load regulation can now also be adjusted to difficult cases with up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Autotune" function automatically tunes the decoder to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder provides up to 1.5A motor current, enough for older motors.
- Please use the Ebay shopping cart to have the shipping costs calculated correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number.
- They receive a tax invoice for each new item purchased from the specialist retailer.
- We usually process your order or enquiry within 24 hours during working days.
Pill problem
Hello dear people of the world,
I hope I'm doing this right, it's my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem: I started taking the pill again about five years ago, mainly because I had unbearably bad period pains and crap PMS before my period.
Now I would like to leave it at that because I already take enough medication for my chronic illnesses that I can't choose.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I had a two-year break of about 0 to 100 explosions all over my face when I came back.
So superficial, but it really got me and I didn't feel good.
In the two years of the break, things never really got back to normal.
Maybe someone has some tips on how to avoid this this time.
My cosmetics are already parfum-free and without perfumes, but maybe there's something someone can recommend to me.
Unfortunately, the gynaecologist did not take me seriously and the dermatologist's appointment is still to come.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the book!
Yes, the lovely skin is such a thing.
She had severe neurodermatitis, then a time of rest, then large areas of lichen planus and the acne issue.
I've also tried everything in terms of nutrition, and I've stayed on a diet with no sugar, milk and meat because nothing else has worked.
It could also be that it's just a worm hormonally, but if you're like me and everywhere you go there's a building site, you'd rather not go looking for what else might be going wrong.
I had already done everything for her colleague.
Written and now I have lost the conversation and do not know what was answered to my request.
I have to work all the time and answer the phone and suddenly everything was gone...
What is there to check if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
But there is one in general
as it is available in black and large
The Zappiti 4K HDR Series - The Best Movie Experience Ever!
Zappiti designs and manufactures high-end video management systems, for best picture quality, excellent performance and best user friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you a comfortable and intuitive way to access your entire film library in stunning 4K High Definition.
The award-winning Zappiti Player is successfully deployed worldwide to enhance the movie experience, both at home and in commercial environments.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats, including the latest 4K HDR standards such as Dolby Vision and HDR10+, almost all current video formats, complete BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color coding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio formats such as DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and has a wide, solid chassis, two HDMI 2.0b outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS:X for the best home cinema experience.
The combination of Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 video processing offers outstanding picture quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, more accurate color rendering, increased contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or front projector, you'll be blown away by the picture quality of your display!
3D also offers a better depth of field and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included in the delivery).
Network Playback: Special network optimization that, thanks to SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files) over Gigabit Ethernet or 10/100 Ethernet, guarantees better playback performance over the local network, regardless of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration with Control4, RTI, Elan, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I've been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing works.
My account appears to be locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers that according to the manufacturer or user manual use the products mentioned above.
Over 10 years experience as a specialist in toner production
All company and brand names and all mentioned type designations are the property of the respective legitimate manufacturers and owners.
Their mention is merely for information and awareness of the compatibility of the goods.
They are not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
What vouchers?
I didn't get my voucher for my last order!
In the name of the people: lay people pass sentences
They sit in their everyday clothes at the judge's bench in the courtroom.
But their verdict carries a lot of weight, even if they don't wear robes: judges decide whether and for how long someone goes to jail.
Two of them report to the "Public" from their time at the Bad Kreuznach District Court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the District Court on John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately I cannot get into my customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for order #NUMBER# again to the email address above?
Can we dispose of the packaging material?
We don't have the facilities to store it for that long.
We would use the table as they offered, as if it were our own.
I had already ordered the same chair in blue in nov. and received it as well. Therefore, because they are so beautiful, I now have one in gray.
Does the wardrobe need to be completely dismantled for collection and return?
and when would collection be?
110 kV underground cables will be rebuilt in 2022
The permit for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is legally binding.
The government of Lower Bavaria's plan approval decision clears the way for construction to begin in 2022.
Now the network operator Bayernwerk has announced this.
The seven-kilometre-long cable will connect the transformer station in Tann in the north of the municipality with the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable is connected to a mast near the village of Edermanning in Reut.
Guten Morgen
My order from 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has only arrived in parts so far.
The blue return slip #PRS_ORG# with the job number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the remark "Delivery not possible".
All three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what the next step is?
Have a great start to the week!
You can forget that, I have already explained this several times yesterday!
It is a glass cabinet and the entire sides are broken, so there is glass everywhere and the box is broken
The wardrobe is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# rules
This means that the chest cannot be picked up because no one is allowed into my apartment
Thanks for the message
But why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's the same for all books, so yes, the request to #PRS_ORG is because it's probably a general problem
Ref: Lesson planning (EK)
Hello dear colleagues and colleagues,
I've been a referee for years, and teaching is fun, but I'm having a hard time right now planning my geography lessons efficiently.
Unfortunately, my school is not well equipped technically, so that I can only use the blackboard, the school book and an overhead projector as a medium.
At school, I can only copy for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need to plan my hours very long.
For example, we are currently working on the topic of geofactors, and for me, every hour is different.
Basically, the methods are always the same, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (I need that time for UBs etc.).
I usually start planning from the learning objective (what I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build it up (I usually make a worksheet with texts from books my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and I am rather dissatisfied with most of the tasks in the book.
That is why the worksheets.
Maybe a geography teacher can tell me how to be efficient with the book.
I would really love that.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from the order #NUMBER#
I've actually already decided on a new one from #PRS_ORG# but I'd really like to get the return as soon as possible.
The trade is worried about the 2G rule during the Christmas season.
Only those who have been vaccinated or recovered are allowed to enter most stores.
The trade says this is unnecessary and complains of lost sales.
He also has a possible solution.
The 2G regulations are damaging the important Christmas trade for the German Retail Association (HDE).
Turnover losses were to be regretted when shopping for non-daily necessities, HDE managing director Stefan Genth criticised.
According to a current survey by the HDE, more than 70 percent of the companies are looking negatively on the remaining days of the year.
Many had already written off the Christmas trade.
"What should have been the positive highlight of the year is now often a hole without bottom," said Genth.
Dealers with 2G access restrictions are said to have lost nearly one-third of their pre-crisis sales last week.
It's going well only in the retail trade in groceries and online.
The association called for consequences to be drawn from the dramatic development.
Shopping with masks, distance and hygiene concept is a safe affair, said the managing director.
"2G shopping doesn't help us in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations have deterred customers and required high staffing levels.
He called for the band rule to be approved nationwide.
Each customer would then only need to be checked once for 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and would have access to all stores with the lanyard they received that day.
In retail outlets, as with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested) in public transport, samples should suffice.
The property group Deutsche Euroshop, which specialises in shopping centres, also spoke of a difficult Christmas trading period.
The frequencies were last without 2G at around 75 percent of the pre-Corona level, the turnover at around 90 percent.
These figures will now fall right in the middle of the important Christmas business," said Chief Executive Officer Wilhelm Wellner to the "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative costs, attempts are being made to find solutions and obtain approval for the centres.
This includes the so-called wristband solution, where "visitors, for example, can prove their 2G status at a central point in the center and then, equipped with a wristband similar to that in a club hotel, can enter all shops without hindrance". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#
The Spiegel has a scratch and there is also a flaw on the frame, which was attempted to be concealed with a yellow filler.
That looks bad.
I would like to return the mirror and have already packed it and stuck it back in the box.
How should I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat SMD LEDs with high power and high color rendering.
A modern microprocessor with extraordinary capabilities controls the colour temperature and brightness of the lamp.
In addition to brightness, there are two standard colour temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to manually set and store the colour temperature in the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Take advantage of the current settings in the flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is simple and intuitive to use.
The light source produces a very bright light with soft, high-quality light, completely flicker-free.
The 120-degree beam angle allows you to illuminate large areas at relatively close distances.
By the way, this also applies in situations where reporters are in small rooms or short distances.
They can practically adjust the brightness without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to have whether you're on a film set or in a studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the luminaire in television studios or when the luminaire is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
On the back of the light is the control panel, consisting of buttons and a light display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for the NP-F battery (not included)
Users can store up to three panel settings for brightness and color temperature.
To set the individual settings on the storage locations, simply press one of the storage keys for a longer period of time and it's done.
The memory controller saves the current state of the lamp when it is switched off, so that when it is switched on again the familiar situation is restored - very useful in studio work, for example, when the camera is set to a particular colour temperature.
Working with a battery is one of the greatest strengths of the DL3120 functionality, due to the ability to operate with inexpensive NP-F batteries.
This is often already owned by photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can draw on existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check before the set if the batteries have enough power - it is a battery tester included - for each of the two battery compartments a value in the two display displays (the left battery upper display, the right on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to power the spotlight continuously from the supplied mains adapter.
The construction of the Scheinwerfer is very simple.
They have a 16mm sleeve for mounting, so you can connect directly to your photo tripod.
The inclination can be reliably set by means of a clamp on both sides.
Care was taken to ensure that the mechanical components are of the highest quality and are therefore designed for longevity and hard use.
In addition, a tilting joint is included in the scope of delivery.
It also comes with a bag, which is great.
This way you can transport or store the luminaire with all the accessories you might want to buy later, without any problems.
Too bad, I got it as a gift and it's too small :(
"Party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrate comeback win against Leverkusen
What a spectacular reaction from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the Hesse, who had lost two games in a row, were supposedly on their way to the next Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned it around, got rid of the frustration of a bad start to the season within an hour and a half, and won 5-2. "It's crazy what the boys have done today," said coach Oliver Glasner to DAZN and spoke of "general praise" to everyone involved.
It looked at first like another disappointment for the now ninth-placed Frankfurt team, which continues to fall short of expectations.
Patrik Schick had put Leverkusen ahead 2-0.
What then happened was also impressive to the SGE coach.
"How the players have come back and shown a fantastic performance," Glasner added.
I'm absolutely delighted with the performance we have shown and of course also with the result.
Also the defenseman Christopher Lenz, who was able to play for the first time since the fourth game day and his overcome muscle injury, emphasized the moral of his team-colleagues.
"I think our mentality is incredible," said the 27-year-old, who was delighted with the result in particular for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
However, Glasner wants to keep the focus on the upcoming tasks, but he is also well-positioned in terms of his personal situation.
It's remarkable that we have all our players fit in December, that all our players are physically in top form.
It's top-class work in our medical department, but the players are also highly professional.
Now they want to "move forward step by step and remain modest" and complete the tasks until the end of the year "at this level."
Next up is a trip to Borussia Monchengladbach (18:30, Sky) on Wednesday as part of the English week.
I'm getting the email that my package is being returned to me due to an error on my part.
I tried calling #PRS_ORG# and they wouldn't let me through, no chance.
Can it be sent directly to me again or do I have to wait until the money has been transferred back and then place the order again?
For me, unfortunately, it would mean that I would not order again because it has already taken too long.
Have they ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
Handball women's dampers for quarter-final against Spain
Germany's women's handball team slumped after the humiliation against Denmark, with their heads down and their eyes vacant.
At the end of the preliminary round of the World Handball Championship, the DHB selection suffered a heavy defeat against Spain (16:32, 8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers.
"We were too scared and had too much respect for the opponent," said national coach Henk Groener.
We must play differently against Spain.
After the first defeat at the tournament, Germany finished the preliminary group III with 8:2 points behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame we couldn't take the flow with us.
That was a bad game we have to get rid of," captain Emily Bölk said.
In the fight to reach the semi-finals, a clear improvement will be needed against the 2019 World Championships runner-up on Tuesday, in order to keep alive the slender hope of winning a medal for the first time since 2007.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was the backcourt player Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We weren't there - neither in attack, nor in defence," back-up Xenia Smits admitted and demanded: "We have to look ahead now."
Not on the same level from front to back
Unlike in the previous five matches, the German team was not at the top from the start.
Missed shots and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately back to normal and prevented with some parades some worse.
The first goal was scored by the DHB team after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counterattack.
However, the hoped-for initial ignition was not.
Against the aggressive defense of the Danes, the German women could hardly get into the game - and when they did, they mostly failed against the strong Althea Reinhardt in the Skandinavians' goal.
The game was called at 3:10 after 20 minutes due to the lopsided score, especially since back court player Mia Zschocke saw red a little later for a hard foul on her opponent.
But she can also take part in the quarter-finals.
It was only in the final phase of the first half that the DHB selection started to play better and at least reached five goals before the break.
The already quiet hope for a comeback after the change was extinguished after seven minutes with 9:19.
The Green proteges sinned again in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who is among the medal contenders in the final round, to do so.
As a result, the German team could no longer muster the strength to improve its performance and went out as a clear loser from the park.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Family traditions in the Christmas season
As part of the Reddit Advent Calendar, we have celebrated St. Nicholas Day and taken this as an opportunity to dedicate ourselves to family traditions in the run-up to Christmas, Advent, St. Nicholas, Christmas Eve and Christmas Day.
How was it at home back then?
Like your\*r partner\*s?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is best for the children?
The boot cleaning?
Baking cookies?
Decorations for the trees?
Will music be played?
Is it Santa Claus, the Christ Child or is it a gift from Oma and Opa?
No matter how you do it, everyone gives it their all and goes out of their way around Christmas to make it as nice as possible as a family.
Whether it's a tradition or even something different every year: tell us how it went or is going in your family!
Please send me any transaction number or anything that might help
Confirmation of transfer... etc
I would like to give a gift card code
as is the case with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
Does that happen to them?
The title is already there, I work as a vaccinator in mobile vaccination teams, where (so far) only the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is being administered in nursing homes.
Since these are soon to be completed to a large extent, they then go on to become vaccination centres for me.
I am happy to answer questions on organisational and human aspects as well as medical questions, provided they are not of a personal nature (e.g. "I take medication X, does this interfere with the vaccination...").
In my area of responsibility, I am responsible for the vaccination, the indication (the person is entitled to a vaccination under the Corona vaccination ordinance and there are no reasons against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, the emergency care in case of allergic reactions (never happened to me).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, such as medical assistants.
However, in vaccination teams we often do not have any, but "only" (in the name of God, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical technicians for the preparation of the vaccine, who are not allowed to carry out vaccinations (can't), so that I carry out most of the vaccinations myself.
Heavy "Huidlerer" question: Amberger knows the solution
What is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in by an Amberger, the BR television programme "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of heated debate.
But unlike many previous days, the term "Host mi?" did not escape the callers this time.
No, it wasn't "a guy who's nervous."
And neither is it for those who are too proud to worship me.
This, the people heard from the TV presenter, was completely wrong.
The man from Amberg informed about the solution and probably caused quite a stir among many Upper Palatines.
"The Huidlerer" the audience learned, "is a rag with which one cleans the stove."
Antony Rowley, a dialectologist from Bayerischer Fernsehen, has been interviewed as an expert for years. He confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived in some way from the rather well-known dialect word "Houdern".
With which a learning gap was closed - also for many who have already been living in the Amberg area for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy any books for two weeks.
After confirmation, the following error message always follows: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG#, connected it to the PC, synchronized and repaired it.
Nothing has helped.
Tire choice for a racing bike - really so safe?
Today, this morning, I woke up full of the desire to do something, because I wanted to train at least a little bit before my bike tour next week.
Said, done and I rode my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then happened what happens in every city (this time: thanks Krefeld!).
Glass on the road.
Zack, a loud squeal and my rear tire didn't want to go any further.
Since I didn't have a real option to get a replacement jacket and wetsuit, I had to turn around and take the first bus home in a bad mood.
It was also not so bad from a technical point of view, maybe it's better if I practice changing a tire before the bike tour.
But now I stand before a question and hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long distance to cover over several days, I would very much dislike getting this problem often.
Now it wasn't really bad, as the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man, who rode them until 14:00 on the day I picked up the bike) had already been described as sub-optimal, as he had ridden them for many years.
But when I think that I have to change a tyre after 80-90kms, then I'm really not in a good mood :D
Now I was talking to an older man at the platform who asked me why I didn't have the Marathon Plus tyres; they're supposed to be unbreakable.
Now, that sounds very tempting.
But are they really so indestructible?
I don't feel like spending 40€ per tyre just to be disappointed in the end.
Furthermore, I wonder: I currently have 25x622 on my road bike.
They do exist (apparently?) in the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you generally advise me on other tyres for a racing bike?
The Schwalbe side seems to me to be my absolute! Laiewissen rather recommend the Durano DD?
Thank you in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car hits tree: driver killed
The 53-year-old was driving on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten when, for unknown reasons, his car crashed into a central island and then veered into the opposite carriageway, police said.
There, a head-on collision with the car of a 27-year-old occurred.
The 53-year-old's car was then driven into a tree and the man was trapped inside.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old passenger were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have all deleted all the books, authorized all the authors and loaded new books.
Environmentally friendly: The products of MOTIP DUPLI are free of health-damaging metals.
The group is committed to using formulations without regulated or questionable ingredients without compromising best-in-class performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only dispose of empty cartridges in the recycling bin.
Bring containers with residue to the problem disposal site.
Marking: All products from MOTIP DUPLI comply with the current labelling regulations.
The classification, labelling and packaging are carried out in accordance with GHS/CLP 1272/2008/EG in the current version.
The safety data sheets comply with REACH 1907/2006/EC, Article 31 and Annex II, in the current version.
Many DUPLI-COLOR spray lacquers prevent unauthorised use with spray protection and tamper-proof closure caps.
Pay attention to the relevant instructions on the cap or label.
Before use, always carefully read and follow the instructions on the label!
Will I get confirmation by e-mail for this?
I've already been assured of this by three of your colleagues... how reliable is your information?
When will the freight forwarder contact me?
I have already written, didn't you get my text?
After the release of our new high-end stereo B 100-6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO series would get a facelift, too.
SOLO 15 is the new Sprössling and is reminiscent of the big models with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this building proposal includes a suitably designed foot to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no effect on acoustics and can therefore be adjusted to suit the acoustics at home accordingly.
The SOLO 15 is very well suited for people for whom the maximum volume plays a subordinate role, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high sound level.
A 10 cm speaker is simply not capable of producing such high sound pressure levels without severe distortion.
However, this does not mean that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
In contrast, it is remarkably adult and for its size extremely impressive and precise.
The SOLO 15 was tuned to a slight up-tone.
This is common practice for wideband applications to optimize the increasingly strong bundling at higher frequencies.
The SOLO 15 is precisely aimed at the listening position and impresses with a very clear and fine sound.
A slight turn outwards can reduce the high tones and warm up the sound.
Thanks to the point source, the individual components of a piece of music can be located with pinpoint accuracy in the optimal stereo triangle.
The reference-suspect extremely low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM provide for an enemy dynamics that matches its own.
The SOLO 15 supplements our SOLO series, but also expands it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all our builds, it is advisable to think about the final appearance of the speaker at the outset, so that any changes to the build can be planned.
If you want to furnish the housing, the speaker must be adjusted accordingly, as the veneer adds material again.
After all the boards have been cut (e.g. at a hardware store), a 8 mm hole should first be drilled into the floor board at the corresponding place, so that the cable can be fed through there later on without any problems.
With the help of a router, the speaker opening in the front follows, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can be installed flush later.
The rear of this opening should be chamfered at 45° to maximise the opening area of the speaker chassis on the inside.
The four connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM are interrupted in the phase, as shown in the picture "Detail Phase".
Then you start with the actual construction of the box and place one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of you.
Now the back, lid, front and floor are glued to this.
The three stiffeners should also be inserted and glued.
The stiffeners themselves can vary in thickness if required, e.g. if you want to use ready-made boards from the DIY store instead of making your own from 16mm MDF.
In the next step, the second side is applied.
Then follow all the plates of the foot, i.e. the two sides, as well as the front.
With a suitable mitre saw or Forstner bit, the installation of the openings for the bass reflex tube, as well as the connection clamp on the rear panel, is made easy.
Then a round-nosed router is used to round off all the edges of the actual box.
The top of the footboard can also be rounded off.
The sole is then glued to the bottom of the case and additionally with long wood screws.
Next, mark and pre-drill (2.5mm drill) the mounting points of the speaker chassis and the connection clamp.
After the housing has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuuming / blowing), work begins on laying the cable.
The easiest way to do this is by using the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the back panel.
The cable is then pulled through the 8 mm hole in the floor piece by piece until it protrudes about 30 cm from the terminal opening.
At the top of the enclosure, run the cable to the speaker opening and let it hang loose there as well.
The frequency selector is then prepared and used.
The construction plan of the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan can be found in the following document: Montageanleitung Weiche Solo 15.
When the frequency switch is installed and the connection terminal is screwed, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box is completed, which is not completely closed.
With a little skill, you can drop hot glue onto the 35mm bASSREFLEX opening and seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and using a small lamp, the seal can be checked accordingly.
Now follows the treatment, according to the description.
Then the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fastened with the corresponding screws.
The polarity is important here, so that the plus lead (marked cable) must be connected to the plus pole of the speaker (larger contact).
Finally, the bass reflex tube is cut to the specified length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To combat the damp, a mat of the damp-absorbing material is cut into two parts and loosely distributed in the housing.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be kept clear.
Can I cancel my order now and have it delivered only in early June?
> Hello to all,
> Finally, we can announce that we will once again host OSCAST this year!
Unfortunately, due to known reasons, we are not able to get more than four people into the studio, which means a higher planning effort and explains the short notice of the announcement.
BUT: There will be at least three people behind the switch, so that we can watch the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans in the stream and hopefully thousands of you!
> We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic - and we'll do everything we can to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
It will start around 0:30.
Think about drinks, good food and get ready for a long but very interesting night.
